California, session 20252026, AB808.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 81007 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 662 of the Statutes of 2018, is amended to read:81007. When a report or statement or copies thereof required to be filed in paper format with any filing officer under this title has been sent by first-class mail or by any other guaranteed overnight delivery service addressed to the filing officer, it shall for purposes of any deadline be deemed to have been received by the filing officer on the date of the deposit in the mail or of receipt by that delivery service. It shall be presumed until the contrary is established that any date stamped by the post office on the envelope or contained on the delivery service receipt containing the report or statement is the date it was deposited in the mail or received by the delivery service. Mail that is not received by the filing officer shall be presumed not to have been sent unless the filer possesses a post office or delivery service receipt establishing the date of deposit and the name and address of the addressee.SEC. 2. Section 81007.5 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 3 of Chapter 662 of the Statutes of 2018, is amended to read:81007.5. (a) Any report or statement or copies thereof required to be filed with any official under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 84100) or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 87100), other than a report or statement that is required to be filed online or electronically with the Secretary of State in accordance with this title or with a local government agency in accordance with an ordinance adopted by the agency pursuant to Section 84615, may be emailed by the applicable deadline, provided that the required originals or paper copies are sent by first-class mail or by any other personal delivery or guaranteed overnight delivery service within 24 hours of the applicable deadline.(b) An emailed report or statement shall not be considered filed if the emailed report or statement is not a true and correct copy of the original.(c) A filing officer who receives an emailed report or statement shall make the report or statement available to the public in the same manner as provided in Section 81008.SEC. 3. Section 81009 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 211 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:81009. (a) Registrations and original campaign reports of persons holding elective state office, candidates for any such office, committees supporting any such officeholder or candidate, and committees supporting or opposing statewide measures, shall be retained by filing officers indefinitely.(b) Original campaign reports of mayors, city council members, county supervisors, candidates for any of these offices, and committees supporting any officeholder or candidate shall be retained indefinitely, except that original campaign reports of candidates not elected to these offices and of committees supporting candidates not elected to these offices shall be retained by filing officers for a period of at least five years.(c) Original campaign reports of all other persons shall be retained by filing officers for at least seven years.(d) Original statements of economic interests of persons holding statewide elective office shall be retained by filing officers indefinitely.(e) Original reports and statements not specified above in this section shall be retained by filing officers for at least seven years.(f) Copies of reports or statements shall be retained by the officer with whom they are filed for at least four years, provided, however, that a filing officer is not required to retain more than one copy of a report or statement.(g) (1) If an original report or statement or a copy is filed in a paper format, the officer with whom it is filed may comply with this section by retaining either of the following available for public inspection:(A) The original report or statement or copy filed in a paper format.(B) An electronic copy.(2) Upon request, the office shall provide copies of such statements pursuant to Section 81008.(3) Reports and statements filed online or electronically under this title shall be retained and archived pursuant to this section and Sections 84602 and 84615.SEC. 4. Section 81010 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 6 of Chapter 662 of the Statutes of 2018, is amended to read:81010. For reports and statements filed with a filing officer pursuant to this title, the filing officer shall do all of the following:(a) Supply the necessary reports and manuals prescribed by the Commission.(b) Determine whether required information has been filed and, if so, whether it conforms on its face with the requirements of this title.(c) Notify promptly all persons and known committees who have failed to file a report or statement in the manner and at the time required by this title.(d) Report apparent violations of this title to the appropriate agencies.(e) Compile and maintain a current list of all reports and statements filed with this office.SEC. 5. Section 82006 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 7 of Chapter 662 of the Statutes of 2018, is amended to read:82006. “Campaign report” means an itemized report that is prepared in a manner prescribed by the Commission and that provides the information required by Chapters 4 and 5 of this title.SEC. 6. Section 82015 of the Government Code is amended to read:82015. (a) “Contribution” means a payment, a forgiveness of a loan, a payment of a loan by a third party, or an enforceable promise to make a payment, except to the extent that full and adequate consideration is received or if it is clear from the surrounding circumstances that the payment is not made for political purposes.(b) “Contribution” includes all of the following:(1) The purchase of tickets for events such as dinners, luncheons, rallies, and similar fundraising events; the candidate’s own money or property used on behalf of the candidate’s candidacy, other than personal funds of the candidate used to pay either a filing fee for a declaration of candidacy or a candidate statement prepared pursuant to Section 13307 of the Elections Code; the granting of discounts or rebates not extended to the public generally or the granting of discounts or rebates by television and radio stations and newspapers not extended on an equal basis to all candidates for the same office; the payment of compensation by any person for the personal services or expenses of any other person if the services are rendered or expenses incurred on behalf of a candidate or committee without payment of full and adequate consideration.(2) The transfer of anything of value received by a committee from another committee, unless full and adequate consideration is received.(3) The payment of public moneys by a state or local governmental agency for a communication to the public that satisfies both of the following:(A) The communication expressly advocates the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or the qualification, passage, or defeat of a clearly identified measure, or, taken as a whole and in context, unambiguously urges a particular result in an election.(B) The communication is made at the behest of the affected candidate or committee.(4) A payment made by a person to a multipurpose organization as defined and described in Section 84222.(5) (A)   A payment made by a lobbyist or a cohabitant of a lobbyist for costs related to a fundraising event held at the home of the lobbyist, including the value of the use of the home as a fundraising event venue. A payment described in this paragraph is attributable to the lobbyist for purposes of Section 85702.(B) A payment made by a lobbying firm for costs related to a fundraising event held at the office of the lobbying firm, including the value of the use of the office as a fundraising event venue.(c) “Contribution” does not include any of the following:(1) Amounts received pursuant to an enforceable promise to the extent those amounts have been previously reported as a contribution. However, the fact that those amounts have been received shall be indicated in the appropriate campaign report.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), a payment made by an occupant of a home or office for costs related to any meeting or fundraising event held in the occupant’s home or office if the costs for the meeting or fundraising event are five hundred dollars ($500) or less.(3) Volunteer personal services or payments made by any individual for the individual’s own travel expenses if the payments are made voluntarily without any understanding or agreement that they will be, directly or indirectly, repaid to the individual.(4) A behested payment, as defined in Section 82004.5, but only as to the behesting committee, elected officer, or member of the Public Utilities Commission.SEC. 7. Section 82018 of the Government Code is amended to read:82018. (a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), “cumulative amount” means the amount of contributions received or expenditures made in the calendar year.(b) For a filer required to file a campaign report or independent expenditure report in one year in connection with an election to be held in another year, the period over which the cumulative amount is calculated shall end on the closing date of the first semiannual report filed after the election.(c) For a filer required to file a campaign report in connection with the qualification of a measure which extends into two calendar years, the period over which the cumulative amount is calculated shall end on December 31 of the second calendar year.(d) For a person filing a campaign report with a period modified by the provisions of this section, the next period over which the cumulative amount is calculated shall begin on the day after the closing date of the report.SEC. 8. Section 82022.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:82022.5. “Election-related activities” include, but are not limited to, the following with respect to candidate-based elections:(a) Communications that contain express advocacy of the nomination or election of a candidate or the defeat of a candidate’s opponent.(b) Communications that contain reference to a candidate’s candidacy for elective office, the candidate’s election campaign, or the candidate’s or the candidate’s opponent’s qualifications for elective office.(c) Solicitation of contributions to the candidate or to third persons for use in support of the candidate or in opposition to the candidate’s opponent.(d) Arranging, coordinating, developing, writing, distributing, preparing, or planning of any communication or activity described in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive.(e) Recruiting or coordinating campaign activities of campaign volunteers on behalf of the candidate.(f) Preparing campaign budgets.(g) Preparing campaign finance disclosure reports.(h) Communications directed to voters or potential voters as part of activities encouraging or assisting persons to vote if the communication contains express advocacy of the nomination or election of the candidate or the defeat of the candidate’s opponent.SEC. 9. Section 82025 of the Government Code is amended to read:82025. (a) “Expenditure” means a payment, a forgiveness of a loan, a payment of a loan by a third party, or an enforceable promise to make a payment, unless it is clear from the surrounding circumstances that it is not made for political purposes. “Expenditure” does not include a candidate’s use of the candidate’s own money to pay for either a filing fee for a declaration of candidacy or a candidate statement prepared pursuant to Section 13307 of the Elections Code. An expenditure is made on the date the payment is made or on the date consideration, if any, is received, whichever is earlier.(b) A payment is made for political purposes if it is any of the following:(1) For purposes of influencing or attempting to influence the action of the voters for or against the nomination or election of a candidate or candidates, or the qualification or passage of any measure.(2) Made by any of the following:(A) A candidate, unless it is clear from surrounding circumstances that the payment was made for personal purposes unrelated to the candidate’s candidacy or status as an officeholder.(B) A controlled committee.(C) An official committee of a political party, including a state central committee, county central committee, assembly district committee, or any subcommittee of such committee.(D) An organization formed or existing primarily for political purposes, as described in paragraph (1), including, but not limited to, a political action committee established by any membership organization, labor union, or corporation.(c) “Expenditure” includes any monetary or nonmonetary payment made by any person, other than the persons or organizations described in subdivision (b), that is used for communications that expressly advocate the nomination, election, or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or candidates, or the qualification, passage, or defeat of a clearly identified ballot measure.(1) “Clearly identified” is defined as follows:(A) A candidate is clearly identified if the communication states the candidate’s name, makes unambiguous reference to the candidate’s office or status as a candidate, or unambiguously describes the candidate in any manner.(B) A group of candidates is clearly identified if the communication makes unambiguous reference to some well-defined characteristic of the group, even if the communication does not name each candidate. A communication that clearly identifies a group of candidates and expressly advocates their election or defeat is reportable as an expenditure, but the expenditure need not be allocated among all members of the class or group on the campaign report disclosing the expenditure.(C) A measure that has qualified to be placed on the ballot is clearly identified if the communication states a proposition number, official title, or popular name associated with the measure. In addition, the measure is clearly identified if the communication refers to the subject matter of the measure and either states that the measure is before the people for a vote or, taken as a whole and in context, unambiguously refers to the measure.(D) A measure that has not qualified to be placed on the ballot is clearly identified if the communication refers to the subject matter of the measure and the qualification drive.(2) A communication “expressly advocates” the nomination, election, or defeat of a candidate or the qualification, passage, or defeat of a measure if it contains express words of advocacy such as “vote for,” “elect,” “support,” “cast your ballot,” “vote against,” “defeat,” “reject,” “sign petitions for,” or, within 60 days before an election in which the candidate or measure appears on the ballot, the communication otherwise refers to a clearly identified candidate or measure so that the communication, taken as a whole, unambiguously urges a particular result in an election.(A) Except for those communications paid for with public moneys by a state or local government agency, a communication, taken as a whole, unambiguously urges a particular result in an election if it is not susceptible of any reasonable interpretation other than as an appeal to vote for or against a specific candidate or measure. A communication is not susceptible of any reasonable interpretation other than as an appeal to vote for or against a specific candidate or measure when, taken as a whole, it could only be interpreted by a reasonable person as containing an appeal to vote for or against a specific candidate or measure because of both of the following:(i) The electoral portion of the communication is unmistakable, unambiguous, and suggestive of only one meaning.(ii) Reasonable minds could not differ as to whether it encourages a vote for or against a clearly identified candidate or measure, or encourages some other kind of action on a legislative, executive, or judicial matter or issue.(B) The following nonexhaustive examples, referring to candidates or measures on the ballot in an upcoming election, illustrate statements that in most contexts would not be susceptible of any reasonable interpretation other than as an appeal to vote for or against a specific candidate or measure: “Smith’s the One”; “No Measure A”; “Rally ‘round O’Malley”; “Create jobs with Measure X”; “Only Nancy Brown can clean out City Hall”; “Proposition 123 - your last chance to save California”; “Joe Green will earn your trust”; “Bob Boone is unqualified for office and a special-interest puppet”; “Shirley Hall - bad for California, bad for you.”(C) The following nonexhaustive examples, referring to candidates or measures on the ballot in an upcoming election, illustrate statements that would be susceptible of a reasonable interpretation other than as an appeal to vote for or against a specific candidate or measure: “Assembly Member Nancy Brown needs to be tough on criminals. Call her and tell her to stand firm on AB 100”; “Poor children need a home too. Support the Mayor’s stance against more budget cuts”; “Thank you, Supervisor Smith, for continuing to support our farmers.”(D) Safe Harbor. A communication does not expressly advocate the nomination, election, or defeat of a candidate, or the qualification, passage, or defeat of a measure, within the meaning of this section, if both of the following apply:(i) The communication does not mention an election, candidacy, political party unless required by law, opposing candidate, or voting by the general public, and it does not take a position on the character, qualifications, or fitness for office of a candidate or officeholder, or the merits of a ballot measure.(ii) The communication focuses on a legislative, executive, or judicial matter or issue, either urging a candidate to take a particular position or action with respect to the matter or issue, or urging the public to adopt a particular position and to contact the candidate with respect to the matter or issue.(E) Rules of Interpretation. If a communication does not qualify for the safe harbor described in subparagraph (D), the commission shall consider if the communication has an interpretation other than as an appeal to vote for or against a clearly identified candidate or measure, in order to determine if, on balance, the communication is not susceptible of any reasonable interpretation other than as an appeal to vote for or against a clearly identified candidate or measure.(3) Reporting Expenditures.(A) The amount of an expenditure reportable pursuant to this subdivision shall include all costs directly attributable to the communication, including, but not limited to, salaries, production, postage, space or time purchased, agency fees, printing, and any additional administrative or overhead costs attributable to the communication. The expenditure does not include any of the regular ongoing business overhead that will be incurred in similar amounts regardless of the communication.(B) When a printed or broadcast communication circulates outside the state, the expenditure may be calculated on the basis of the fraction of the total cost attributable to circulation within the state.(C) Costs directly traceable to the communication are reportable when the communication is made, or when payments are made in connection with the development, production, or dissemination of the communication, whichever occurs first.(D) The costs of printing and distributing petitions, recruiting, training, and paying expenses of petition circulators, and other costs incurred in connection with the qualification of a measure are reportable expenditures.(4) Except for those communications paid for with public moneys by a state or local government agency, notwithstanding this subdivision, “expenditure” does not include costs incurred for communications that expressly advocate the nomination, election, or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or candidates, or the qualification, passage, or defeat of a clearly identified measure or measures by either of the following:(A) A broadcasting station, including a cable or satellite television operation, programmer, or producer, internet website, or a regularly published newspaper, magazine, or other periodical of general circulation, including an internet or electronic publication, that routinely carries news and commentary of general interest, for the cost of covering or carrying a news story, commentary, or editorial.(B) A regularly published newsletter or regularly published periodical, other than those specified in subparagraph (A), whose circulation is limited to an organization’s members, employees, shareholders, other affiliated individuals, and those who request or purchase the publication. This subparagraph applies only to the costs regularly incurred in publishing the newsletter or periodical. If additional costs are incurred because the newsletter or periodical is issued on other than its regular schedule, expanded in circulation, or substantially altered in style, size, or format, the additional costs are expenditures.(5) The term “expenditure” also does not include uncompensated internet activity by an individual supporting or opposing a candidate or measure as stated in Section 18215.2 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations.(d) A payment used to make contributions, as defined in Section 82015, is an expenditure.SEC. 10. Section 82046 of the Government Code is amended to read:82046. (a) “Period covered” by a statement or report required to be filed by this title, other than a campaign report, means, unless a different period is specified, the period beginning with the day after the closing date of the most recent statement or report which was required to be filed, and ending with the closing date of the statement or report in question. If the person filing the statement or report has not previously filed a statement or report of the same type, the period covered begins on the day on which the first reportable transaction occurred. Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to exempt any person from disclosing transactions which occurred prior to the effective date of this title according to the laws then in effect.(b) “Period covered” by a campaign report required pursuant to Sections 84200, 84200.5, 84202.3, and 84202.7 means, unless a different period is specified, the period beginning the day after the closing date of the most recent campaign report which was required to be filed and ending with the closing date of the statement in question. If a person has not previously filed a campaign report, the period covered begins on January 1.SEC. 11. Section 83113 of the Government Code is amended to read:83113. The commission shall, in addition to its other duties, do all of the following:(a) Specify the format for reports, statements, notices and other documents required by this title.(b) Prepare and publish manuals and instructions setting forth methods of bookkeeping and preservation of records to facilitate compliance with and enforcement of this title, and explaining the duties of persons and committees under this title.(c) Provide assistance to agencies and public officials in administering the provisions of this title.(d) Maintain a central file of local campaign contribution and expenditure ordinances forwarded to it by local government agencies.(e) Annually publish the provisions of this title no later than March 1.SEC. 12. Section 84100 of the Government Code is amended to read:84100. (a) Every recipient committee, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 82013, shall have a treasurer. An expenditure shall not be made by or on behalf of a committee without the authorization of the treasurer or the treasurer’s designated agents. A contribution or expenditure shall not be accepted or made by or on behalf of a committee when the office of treasurer is vacant.(b) A recipient committee, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 82013, may designate one assistant treasurer on the committee’s registration. The assistant treasurer may sign and verify a campaign report on behalf of the committee if the assistant uses reasonable diligence to prepare and review the report and signs to that effect under penalty of perjury as required by Section 81004.SEC. 13. Section 84101 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 180 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:84101. (a) A committee that is a committee by virtue of subdivision (a) of Section 82013 shall register online or electronically with the Secretary of State within 10 days after the committee has qualified as a committee. The Secretary of State shall assign a number to each committee that registers and shall notify the committee of the number. The Secretary of State shall make available to the local filing officer, as designated by the filer on their registration, the information filed pursuant to this subdivision.(b) In addition to registering as required by subdivision (a), if a committee qualifies as a committee under subdivision (a) of Section 82013 within 16 days before the date of an election in connection with which the committee is required to file preelection reports, the committee shall register, within 24 hours of qualifying as a committee, online or electronically with the Secretary of State. Within 24 hours, the Secretary of State shall make available to the local filing officer designated by the filer on their registration the information filed pursuant to this subdivision.(c) If an independent expenditure committee qualifies as a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 during the time period described in Section 82036.5 and makes independent expenditures of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more to support or oppose a candidate or candidates for office, the committee shall register, within 24 hours of qualifying as a committee, online or electronically with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall make the information filed available to the local filing officer designated by the filer on their registration and the filing officers designated by the filer on their registration for the candidate or candidates supported or opposed by the independent expenditures within 24 hours of a registration filed pursuant to this subdivision. The filings required by this section are in addition to filings that may be required by Section 84204.(d) For purposes of this section, in calculating whether two thousand dollars ($2,000) in contributions has been received, payments for a filing fee or for a statement of qualifications to appear in a state or county voter information guide shall not be included if these payments have been made from the candidate’s personal funds.(e) (1) For purposes of this subdivision, “authorized person” means a person, other than the treasurer, who is authorized to obtain the bank records of the committee from the financial institution where the campaign bank account is maintained.(2) The Secretary of State shall not include a bank account number or the name of an authorized person on or with any registration information provided to the local filing officer pursuant to this section.(3) Notwithstanding Section 81008 or the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), the Secretary of State shall not provide to the public the bank account number or the name of an authorized person provided by a committee when registering.SEC. 14. Section 84101.5 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 3 of Chapter 317 of the Statutes of 2021, is amended to read:84101.5. (a) Notwithstanding Section 81006, the Secretary of State shall charge each committee that is required to register pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 84101 an annual fee of fifty dollars ($50) until the committee is terminated pursuant to Section 84214.(b) (1) A committee subject to the annual fee pursuant to subdivision (a) shall pay the fee no later than 15 days after filing its registration and no later than April 30 of each year thereafter, except as provided in paragraph (2).(2) A committee that is created, and pays the initial fee pursuant to paragraph (1), in October, November, or December of a calendar year is not subject to the annual fee for the following calendar year.(c) (1) A committee that fails to timely pay the annual fee required by this section is subject to an administrative penalty of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).(2) The Secretary of State shall enforce the requirements of this section.SEC. 15. Section 84102 of the Government Code is amended to read:84102. Committee registration required by Section 84101 shall include all of the following:(a) The name, street address, email address, and telephone number, if any, of the committee. In the case of a sponsored committee, the name of the committee shall include the name of its sponsor. If a committee has more than one sponsor, and the sponsors are members of an industry or other identifiable group, a term identifying that industry or group shall be included in the name of the committee.(b) In the case of a sponsored committee, the name, street address, and telephone number of each sponsor.(c) The full name, street address, email address, and telephone number of the treasurer and any other principal officers.(1) A committee with more than one principal officer shall identify its principal officers as follows:(A) A committee with three or fewer principal officers shall identify all principal officers.(B) A committee with more than three principal officers shall identify no fewer than three principal officers.(2) If no individual other than the treasurer is a principal officer, the treasurer shall be identified as both the treasurer and the principal officer.(d) (1) An acknowledgment by any person identified as a treasurer or assistant treasurer on the committee registration of the following:(A) By serving as treasurer or assistant treasurer, the person must comply with all applicable duties stated in this title and the regulations of the Commission.(B) A violation of these duties could result in criminal, civil, or administrative penalties.(2) A failure to complete the acknowledgment pursuant to paragraph (1) is not a violation of this title. However, the Secretary of State shall not accept a committee registration unless the acknowledgment has been completed.(e) The full name and office sought by a candidate, and the title and ballot number, if any, of any measure, that the committee supports or opposes as its primary activity. A committee that does not support or oppose one or more candidates or ballot measures as its primary activity shall provide a brief description of its political activities, including whether it supports or opposes candidates or measures and whether such candidates or measures have common characteristics, such as a political party preference.(f) A statement whether the committee is independent or controlled and, if it is controlled, the name of each candidate or state measure proponent by which it is controlled, or the name of any controlled committee with which it acts jointly. If a committee is controlled by a candidate for partisan or voter-nominated office, the controlled committee shall indicate the political party, if any, for which the candidate has disclosed a preference.(g) For a committee that is a committee by virtue of subdivision (a) of Section 82013, the name and address of the financial institution in which the committee has established an account and the account number.(h) If the committee registration is filed by a candidate, the name, street address, and treasurer of any other committee controlled by the same candidate. (i) Other information as shall be required by the rules or regulations of the Commission consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter.SEC. 16. Section 84103 of the Government Code is amended to read:84103. (a) If there is a change in any of the information contained in a committee registration, the committee shall amend its registration within 10 days to reflect the change. The Secretary of State shall make available to the local filing officer designated by the filer on their registration the information filed pursuant to this subdivision.(b) (1) In addition to amending a committee registration as required by subdivision (a), a committee as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 82013 shall amend its committee registration within 24 hours if the change requiring the amendment occurs within 16 days before the date of the election in connection with which the committee is required to file a preelection report, and if any of the following information is changed:(A) The name of the committee.(B) The name of the treasurer or other principal officers.(C) The name of any candidate or committee by which the committee is controlled or with which it acts jointly.(2) The amendment shall include the changed information, the date of the change, and the committee’s name and identification number.(3) Within 24 hours, the Secretary of State shall make available to the local filing officer designated by the filer on their registration the information filed pursuant to this subdivision.(c) (1) If an amendment to a committee registration identifies a new treasurer or assistant treasurer that person shall complete the acknowledgment required by subdivision (d) of Section 84102.(2) A failure to complete the acknowledgment pursuant to paragraph (1) is not a violation of this title. However, the Secretary of State shall not accept an amendment to a committee registration that identifies a new treasurer or assistant treasurer unless the acknowledgment has been completed.(3) This subdivision shall not become operative until the Secretary of State certifies an online filing and disclosure system pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 84602.SEC. 17. Section 84104 of the Government Code is amended to read:84104. It shall be the duty of each candidate, treasurer, principal officer, and elected officer to maintain detailed accounts, records, bills, and receipts necessary to prepare campaign reports, to establish that campaign reports were properly filed, and to otherwise comply with the provisions of this chapter. The detailed accounts, records, bills, and receipts shall be retained by the filer for a period specified by the Commission. However, the Commission shall not require retention of records for a period longer than the statute of limitations specified in Section 91000.5 or two years after the adoption of an audit report pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 90000), whichever is less.SEC. 18. Section 84106 of the Government Code is amended to read:84106. (a) Whenever identification of a sponsored committee is required by this title, the identification shall include the full name of the committee as required in its committee registration.(b) A sponsored committee shall use only one name in its committee registration.SEC. 19. Section 84108 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 12 of Chapter 662 of the Statutes of 2018, is amended to read:84108. (a) Every slate mailer organization shall comply with the requirements of Sections 84100, 84101, 84103, and 84104.(b) The registration of a slate mailer organization shall include:(1) The name, street address, email address, and telephone number of the organization. In the case of an individual or business entity that qualifies as a slate mailer organization, the name of the slate mailer organization shall include the name by which the individual or entity is identified for legal purposes. Whenever identification of a slate mailer organization is required by this title, the identification shall include the full name of the slate mailer organization as contained in its registration.(2) The full name, street address, email address, and telephone number of the treasurer and other principal officers.(3) The full name, street address, email address, and telephone number of each person with final decisionmaking authority as to which candidates or measures will be supported or opposed in the organization’s slate mailers.(c) The registration shall be submitted online or electronically with the Secretary of State within 10 days after the slate mailer organization receives or is promised five hundred dollars ($500) or more for producing one or more slate mailers. However, if an entity qualifies as a slate mailer organization within 16 days before the date of an election in which it is required to file preelection reports, the slate mailer organization shall register online or electronically with the Secretary of State within 24 hours of qualifying as a slate mailer organization.SEC. 20. Section 84200 of the Government Code is amended to read:84200. (a) Except as provided in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), elected officers, candidates, and committees pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 shall file semiannual reports each year no later than July 31 for the period ending June 30, and no later than January 31 for the period ending December 31.(1) A candidate who, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 85200, has indicated on their statement of intention that they do not intend to qualify as a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013, and who, during the past six months, has not otherwise qualified as a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013, shall not be required to file a semiannual report for that six-month period.(2) Elected officers whose salaries are less than two hundred dollars ($200) a month, judges, judicial candidates, and their controlled committees shall not file semiannual reports pursuant to this subdivision for any six-month period in which they have not made or received any contributions or made any expenditures.(3) A judge who is not listed on the ballot for reelection to, or recall from, any elective office during a calendar year shall not file semiannual reports pursuant to this subdivision for any six-month period in that year if both of the following apply:(A) The judge has not received any contributions.(B) The only expenditures made by the judge during the calendar year are contributions from the judge’s personal funds to other candidates or committees totaling less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).(b) All committees pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013 shall file campaign reports each year no later than July 31 for the period ending June 30, and no later than January 31 for the period ending December 31, if they have made contributions or independent expenditures, including payments to a slate mailer organization, during the six-month period before the closing date of the reports.SEC. 21. Section 84200.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:84200.5. (a) In addition to the semiannual campaign reports required by Section 84200, the following elected officers, candidates, and committees shall file preelection reports under Section 84200.8:(1) All candidates appearing on the ballot at the next election, their controlled committees, and committees primarily formed to support or oppose an elected officer, candidate, or measure appearing on the ballot for the next election.(2) All elected state officers and candidates for elective state office who are not appearing on the ballot at the next state primary or general election, and who, during the preelection reporting periods covered by Section 84200.8, make contributions or independent expenditures totaling five hundred dollars ($500) or more to a state or county general purpose committee, or to support or oppose a candidate or measure appearing on the ballot at the next state primary or general election.(3) A state or county general purpose committee formed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013, other than a political party committee as defined in Section 85205, that, during the preelection reporting periods covered by Section 84200.8, makes contributions or independent expenditures totaling five hundred dollars ($500) or more to a state or county general purpose committee, or to support or oppose a candidate or measure appearing on the ballot at the next state primary or general election. However, a state or county general purpose committee formed pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013 is not required to file the preelection reports specified in Section 84200.8.(4) A political party committee as defined in Section 85205 that, during the preelection reporting periods covered by Section 84200.8, receives contributions totaling one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more, or makes contributions or independent expenditures totaling five hundred dollars ($500) or more, to a state or county general purpose committee, or to support or oppose a candidate or measure appearing on the ballot at a state election.(5) A city general purpose committee formed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 that, during the preelection reporting periods covered by Section 84200.8, makes contributions or independent expenditures totaling five hundred dollars ($500) or more to a city general purpose committee formed within the same jurisdiction, or to support or oppose a candidate or measure appearing on the ballot at the next city election. However, a city general purpose committee formed pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013 is not required to file the preelection reports specified in Section 84200.8.(b) During an election period for the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or the Teachers’ Retirement Board, the following candidates and committees shall file the preelection reports specified in Section 84200.9:(1) All candidates for these boards, their controlled committees, and committees primarily formed to support or oppose the candidates.(2) A state or county general purpose committee formed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 that, during the preelection reporting periods covered by Section 84200.9, makes contributions or independent expenditures totaling five hundred dollars ($500) or more to support or oppose a candidate for the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or the Teachers’ Retirement Board. However, a general purpose committee formed pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013 is not required to file the reports specified in Section 84200.9.SEC. 22. Section 84200.8 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 13 of Chapter 662 of the Statutes of 2018, is amended to read:84200.8. Preelection reports shall be filed under this section as follows:(a) For the period ending 45 days before the election, the report shall be filed no later than 40 days before the election.(b) For the period ending 17 days before the election, the report shall be filed no later than 12 days before the election.(c) For runoff elections held within 60 days of the qualifying election, an additional preelection report for the period ending 17 days before the runoff election shall be filed no later than 12 days before the election.(d) All candidates being voted on in the election in connection with which the report is filed, their controlled committees, and committees formed primarily to support or oppose a candidate or measure being voted on in that election shall file the statement due 12 days before the election in subdivisions (b) and (c) online or electronically, if required or, for a city or county committee filing in paper format, by guaranteed overnight delivery service or personal delivery.SEC. 23. Section 84200.9 of the Government Code is amended to read:84200.9. Preelection reports for an election period for the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or the Teachers’ Retirement Board shall be filed as follows:(a) For the period ending five days before the beginning of the ballot period, as determined by the relevant board, a report shall be filed no later than two days before the beginning of the ballot period.(b) For the period ending five days before the deadline to return ballots, as determined by the relevant board, a report shall be filed no later than two days before the deadline to return ballots.(c) In the case of a runoff election, for the period ending five days before the deadline to return runoff ballots, as determined by the relevant board, a report shall be filed no later than two days before the deadline to return runoff ballots.(d) All candidates being voted upon, their controlled committees, and committees primarily formed to support or oppose a candidate being voted upon in that election shall file the reports specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) by guaranteed overnight delivery service or by personal delivery.SEC. 24. Section 84202.3 of the Government Code is amended to read:84202.3. (a) In addition to the campaign reports required by Section 84200, committees pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 that are primarily formed to support or oppose the qualification, passage, or defeat of a measure and proponents of a state ballot measure who control a committee formed or existing primarily to support the qualification, passage, or defeat of a state ballot measure, shall file campaign reports on the following dates:(1) No later than April 30 for the period January 1 through March 31.(2) No later than October 31 for the period July 1 through September 30.(b) This section does not apply to a committee during any semiannual period in which the committee is required to file preelection reports pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 84200.5.(c) This section does not apply to a committee following the election at which the measure is voted upon unless the committee makes contributions or expenditures to support or oppose the qualification or passage of another ballot measure.SEC. 25. Section 84202.7 of the Government Code is amended to read:84202.7. During an odd-numbered year, any committee by virtue of Section 82013 that makes contributions totaling ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more to elected state officers, their controlled committees, or committees primarily formed to support or oppose any elected state officer during a period specified below shall file campaign reports on the following dates:(a) No later than April 30 for the period of January 1 through March 31.(b) No later than October 31 for the period of July 1 through September 30.SEC. 26. Section 84203 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 161 of Chapter 50 of the Statutes of 2021, is amended to read:84203. (a) Each candidate or committee that makes or receives a late contribution, as defined in Section 82036, shall report the late contribution to each office with which the candidate or committee is required to file its next campaign report pursuant to Section 84215.(1) The candidate or committee that makes the late contribution shall report the candidate or committee’s full name and street address and the full name and street address of the person to whom the late contribution has been made, the office sought if the recipient is a candidate, or the ballot measure number or letter if the recipient is a committee primarily formed to support or oppose a ballot measure, and the date and amount of the late contribution.(2) The recipient of the late contribution shall report the recipient’s full name and street address, the date and amount of the late contribution, whether the contribution was a monetary contribution, in-kind contribution of goods or services, or a loan, the cumulative amount of contributions, and whether the contribution was for the primary, general, or other election, if required. The recipient shall also report the full name of the contributor, the contributor’s street address, occupation, and the name of the contributor’s employer, or, if self-employed, the name of the business.(b) A late contribution shall be reported within 24 hours of the time it is made in the case of the candidate or committee that makes the contribution and within 24 hours of the time it is received in the case of the recipient. A late contribution shall be reported online or electronically, if required, or for a city or county committee filing in paper format, by email, guaranteed overnight delivery, or personal delivery. If a late contribution is required to be reported to the Secretary of State, the report to the Secretary of State shall be by online or electronic transmission only. A late contribution shall be reported on subsequent campaign reports without regard to reports filed pursuant to this section.(c) A late contribution need not be reported nor shall it be deemed accepted if it is not cashed, negotiated, or deposited and is returned to the contributor within 24 hours of its receipt.(d) A report filed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other campaign report required to be filed by this chapter.(e) The report required pursuant to this section is not required to be filed by a candidate or committee that has disclosed the late contribution pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 85309.SEC. 27. Section 84204 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 15 of Chapter 662 of the Statutes of 2018, is amended to read:84204. (a) A committee that makes a late independent expenditure, as defined in Section 82036.5, shall report the late independent expenditure within 24 hours of the time it is made. A late independent expenditure shall be reported online or electronically, if required, or if filing in a paper format, by email, guaranteed overnight delivery, or personal delivery. If a late independent expenditure is required to be reported to the Secretary of State, the report to the Secretary of State shall be by online or electronic transmission only. A late independent expenditure shall be reported on subsequent campaign reports without regard to reports filed pursuant to this section.(b) A committee that makes a late independent expenditure shall report its full name and street address, as well as the name, office, and district of the candidate if the report is related to a candidate, or if the report is related to a measure, the number or letter of the measure, whether the expenditure was made to support or oppose the candidate or ballot measure, the jurisdiction in which the measure is to be voted upon, and the amount and the date, as well as a description of goods or services for which the late independent expenditure was made. In addition to the information required by this subdivision, a committee that makes a late independent expenditure shall include with its late independent expenditure report the information required by paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (f) of Section 84211, covering the period from the day after the closing date of the last campaign report filed to the date of the late independent expenditure, or if the committee has not previously filed a campaign report, covering the period from the previous January 1 to the date of the late independent expenditure. Information required by paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (f) of Section 84211 that is required to be reported with a late independent expenditure report by this subdivision is not required to be reported on more than one late independent expenditure report.(c) A committee that makes a late independent expenditure shall file a late independent expenditure report in the places where it would be required to file campaign reports under this article as if it were formed or existing primarily to support or oppose the candidate or measure for or against which it is making the late independent expenditure.(d) A report filed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other campaign report required to be filed by this article.(e) Expenditures that have been disclosed by candidates and committees pursuant to Section 85500 are not required to be disclosed pursuant to this section.SEC. 28. Section 84204.5 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 16 of Chapter 662 of the Statutes of 2018, is amended to read:84204.5. (a) In addition to any other report required by this title, a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 that is required to file reports pursuant to Section 84605 shall file online or electronically with the Secretary of State each time it makes contributions totaling five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more or each time it makes independent expenditures totaling five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more to support or oppose the qualification or passage of a single state ballot measure. The report shall be filed within 10 business days of making the contributions or independent expenditures and shall contain all of the following:(1) The full name, street address, and identification number of the committee.(2) The number or letter of the measure if the measure has qualified for the ballot and has been assigned a number or letter; the title of the measure if the measure has not been assigned a number or letter but has been issued a title by the Attorney General; or the subject of the measure if the measure has not been assigned a number or letter and has not been issued a title by the Attorney General.(3) In the case of a contribution, the date and amount of the contribution and the name, address, and identification number of the committee to whom the contribution was made. In addition, the report shall include the information required by paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (f) of Section 84211, regarding contributions or loans received from a person described in that subdivision, covering the period from the day after the closing date of the last campaign report filed to the date of the contribution requiring a report under this section, or if the committee has not previously filed a campaign report, covering the period from the previous January 1 to the date of the contribution requiring a report under this section. The information described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (f) of Section 84211 that is required to be reported pursuant to this subdivision is not required to be reported in more than one report provided for in this subdivision for each contribution or loan received from a person described in subdivision (f) of Section 84211.(4) In the case of an independent expenditure, the date, amount, and a description of the goods or services for which the expenditure was made. In addition, the report shall include the information required by paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (f) of Section 84211 regarding contributions or loans received from a person described in that subdivision, covering the period from the day after the closing date of the last campaign report filed to the date of the expenditure, or if the committee has not previously filed a campaign report, covering the period from the previous January 1 to the date of the expenditure. The information described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (f) of Section 84211 that is required to be reported pursuant to this subdivision is not required to be reported in more than one report provided for in this subdivision for each contribution or loan received from a person described in subdivision (f) of Section 84211.(b) In addition to any other report required by this title, a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 shall file a report each time it makes contributions totaling five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more or independent expenditures aggregating five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more to support or oppose the qualification of a single local initiative or referendum ballot measure. A committee that is required to file a report under this subdivision shall file the report in the places where it would be required to file campaign reports under this article as if it were formed or existing primarily to support or oppose the local initiative or referendum ballot measure. The report shall be filed within 10 business days of reaching the aggregate dollar threshold and shall contain all of the following:(1) The full name, street address, and identification number of the committee.(2) The name or subject of the measure.(3) In the case of an independent expenditure, the date, amount, and a description of the goods or services for which the expenditure was made. In the case of a contribution, the date and amount of the contribution and the name, address, and identification number of the committee to which the contribution was made. In addition, the report shall include the information required by paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (f) of Section 84211 regarding contributions or loans received from a person described in that subdivision, covering the period from the day after the closing date of the last campaign report filed to the date of the contribution or expenditure, or if the committee has not previously filed a campaign report, covering the period from the previous January 1 to the date of the contribution or expenditure. The information described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (f) of Section 84211 that is required to be reported pursuant to this subdivision is not required to be reported in more than one report provided for in this subdivision for each contribution or loan received from a person described in subdivision (f) of Section 84211.(c) Reports required by this section are not required to be filed by a committee primarily formed to support or oppose the qualification or passage of a state ballot measure or the qualification of a local initiative or referendum ballot measure for expenditures made on behalf of the ballot measure or measures for which it is formed.(d) Independent expenditures that have been disclosed by a committee pursuant to Section 84204 or 85500 are not required to be disclosed pursuant to this section.SEC. 29. Section 84205 of the Government Code is amended to read:84205. The commission may, by regulation or written advice, permit candidates and committees to combine campaign reports when filing as required by this title.SEC. 30. Section 84206 of the Government Code is repealed.SEC. 31. Section 84207 of the Government Code is amended to read:84207. (a) An elected member of, or a candidate for election to, a county central committee of a qualified political party who receives contributions of less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) and who makes expenditures of less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) in a calendar year shall not be required to file any campaign reports required by this title.(b) Notwithstanding Sections 81009.5 and 81013, a local government agency shall not impose any filing requirements on an elected member of, or a candidate for election to, a county central committee of a qualified political party who receives contributions of less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) and who makes expenditures of less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) in a calendar year.SEC. 32. Section 84209 of the Government Code is amended to read:84209. A candidate or state measure proponent and any committee or committees which the candidate or a state measure proponent controls may file consolidated campaign reports under this chapter. Such consolidated reports shall be filed in each place each of the committees and the candidate or state measure proponent would be required to file campaign reports if separate reports were filed.SEC. 33. Section 84211 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 163 of Chapter 50 of the Statutes of 2021, is amended to read:84211. Each campaign report required by Sections 84200 and 84200.5 shall contain all of the following information:(a) The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the campaign report and the total cumulative amount of contributions received.(b) The total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the campaign report and the total cumulative amount of expenditures made.(c) The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the campaign report from persons who have given a cumulative amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or more.(d) The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the campaign report from persons who have given a cumulative amount of less than one hundred dollars ($100).(e) The balance of cash and cash equivalents on hand at the beginning and the end of the period covered by the campaign report.(f) If the cumulative amount of contributions (including loans) received from a person is one hundred dollars ($100) or more and a contribution or loan has been received from that person during the period covered by the campaign report, all of the following:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) That person’s occupation.(4) The name of that person’s employer, or, if self-employed, the name of the business.(5) The date and amount received for each contribution received during the period covered by the campaign report and whether the contribution was made in the form of a monetary contribution, in-kind contribution of goods or services, or a loan.(6) The cumulative amount of contributions.(g) If the cumulative amount of loans received from or made to a person is one hundred dollars ($100) or more, and a loan has been received from or made to a person during the period covered by the campaign report, or is outstanding during the period covered by the campaign report, all of the following:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) That person’s occupation.(4) The name of that person’s employer, or, if self-employed, the name of the business.(5) The original date and amount of each loan.(6) The due date and interest rate of the loan.(7) The cumulative payment made or received to date at the end of the reporting period.(8) The balance outstanding at the end of the reporting period.(9) The cumulative amount of contributions.(h) For each person, other than the filer, who is directly, indirectly, or contingently liable for repayment of a loan received or outstanding during the period covered by the campaign report, all of the following:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) That person’s occupation.(4) The name of that person’s employer, or, if self-employed, the name of the business.(5) The amount that person’s maximum liability outstanding.(i) The total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the campaign report to persons who have received one hundred dollars ($100) or more.(j) The total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the campaign report to persons who have received less than one hundred dollars ($100).(k) For each person to whom an expenditure of one hundred dollars ($100) or more has been made during the period covered by the campaign report, all of the following:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) The date and amount of each expenditure.(4) A brief description of the consideration for which each expenditure was made.(5) In the case of an expenditure which is a contribution to a candidate, elected officer, or committee or an independent expenditure to support or oppose a candidate or measure, in addition to the information required in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, the date of the contribution or independent expenditure, the cumulative amount of contributions made to a candidate, elected officer, or committee, or the cumulative amount of independent expenditures made relative to a candidate or measure; the full name of the candidate, and the office and district for which the candidate seeks nomination or election, or the number or letter of the measure; and the jurisdiction in which the measure or candidate is voted upon.(6) The information required in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, for each person, if different from the payee, who has provided consideration for an expenditure of five hundred dollars ($500) or more during the period covered by the campaign report.For purposes of subdivisions (i), (j), and (k) only, the terms “expenditure” or “expenditures” mean any individual payment or accrued expense, unless it is clear from surrounding circumstances that a series of payments or accrued expenses are for a single service or product.(l) In the case of a controlled committee, an official committee of a political party, or an organization formed or existing primarily for political purposes, the amount and source of any miscellaneous receipt.(m) If a committee is listed pursuant to subdivision (f), (g), (h), (k), (l), or (p), the number assigned to the committee by the Secretary of State shall be listed, or, if a number has not been assigned, the full name and street address of the treasurer of the committee.(n) In a campaign report filed by a candidate who is a candidate in both a state primary and general election, such a candidate’s controlled committee, or a committee primarily formed to support or oppose such a candidate, the total amount of contributions received and the total amount of expenditures made for the period of January 1 through June 30 and the total amount of contributions received and expenditures made for the period of July 1 through December 31.(o) The full name, residential or business address, email address, and telephone number of the filer, or, in the case of a campaign report filed by a committee defined by subdivision (a) of Section 82013, the name, street address, email address, and telephone number of the committee and of the committee treasurer. In the case of a committee defined by subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013, the name that the filer uses on campaign reports shall be the name by which the filer is identified for other legal purposes or any name by which the filer is commonly known to the public. (p) A contribution need not be reported nor shall it be deemed accepted if it is not cashed, negotiated, or deposited and is returned to the contributor before the closing date of the campaign report on which the contribution would otherwise be reported.(q) If a committee primarily formed for the qualification or support of, or opposition to, an initiative or ballot measure is required to report an expenditure to a business entity pursuant to subdivision (k) and 50 percent or more of the business entity is owned by a candidate or person controlling the committee, by an officer or employee of the committee, or by a spouse of any of these individuals, the committee’s campaign report shall also contain, in addition to the information required by subdivision (k), that person’s name, the relationship of that person to the committee, and a description of that person’s ownership interest or position with the business entity.(r) If a committee primarily formed for the qualification or support of, or opposition to, an initiative or ballot measure is required to report an expenditure to a business entity pursuant to subdivision (k), and a candidate or person controlling the committee, an officer or employee of the committee, or a spouse of any of these individuals is an officer, partner, consultant, or employee of the business entity, the committee’s campaign report shall also contain, in addition to the information required by subdivision (k), that person’s name, the relationship of that person to the committee, and a description of that person’s ownership interest or position with the business entity.(s) If the campaign report is filed by a committee, as defined in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013, information sufficient to identify the nature and interests of the filer, including:(1) If the filer is an individual, the name and address of the filer’s employer, if any, or the filer’s principal place of business if the filer is self-employed, and a description of the business activity in which the filer or the filer’s employer is engaged.(2) If the filer is a business entity, a description of the business activity in which it is engaged.(3) If the filer is an industry, trade, or professional association, a description of the industry, trade, or profession which it represents, including a specific description of any portion or faction of the industry, trade, or profession which the association exclusively or primarily represents.(4) If the filer is not an individual, business entity, or industry, trade, or professional association, a statement of the person’s nature and purposes, including a description of any industry, trade, profession, or other group with a common economic interest which the person principally represents or from which its membership or financial support is principally derived.SEC. 34. Section 84212 of the Government Code is amended to read:84212. The disclosures for the reporting of loan information required by this chapter shall provide for the reporting of loans and similar transactions in a manner that does not result in substantial overstatement or understatement of total contributions and expenditures.SEC. 35. Section 84213 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 165 of Chapter 50 of the Statutes of 2021, is amended to read:84213. (a) A candidate or state measure proponent shall verify the candidate’s or proponent’s campaign report and the campaign report of each committee subject to the candidate or state measure proponent’s control. The verification shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 81004 except that it shall state that to the best of the candidate or state measure proponent’s knowledge the treasurer of each controlled committee used all reasonable diligence in the preparation of the committee’s report. This section does not relieve the treasurer of any committee from the obligation to verify each campaign report filed by the committee pursuant to Section 81004.(b) A committee reporting an independent expenditure on a preelection or semiannual campaign report shall verify all of the following:“I have not received any unreported contributions or reimbursements to make these independent expenditures. I have not coordinated any expenditure made during this reporting period with the candidate or the opponent of the candidate who is the subject of the expenditure, with the proponent or the opponent of the state measure that is the subject of the expenditure, or with the agents of the candidate or the opponent of the candidate or the state measure proponent or opponent.”SEC. 36. Section 84214 of the Government Code is amended to read:84214. Committees and candidates shall terminate their filing obligation pursuant to regulations adopted by the commission which insure that a committee or candidate will have no activity which must be disclosed pursuant to this chapter subsequent to the termination. Such regulations shall not require the filing of any campaign reports other than those required by this chapter. In no case shall a committee which qualifies solely under subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013 be required to file any notice of its termination.SEC. 37. Section 84215 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 19 of Chapter 662 of the Statutes of 2018, is amended to read:84215. Campaign reports shall be filed at the following places:(a) Statewide elected officers, including members of the State Board of Equalization; Members of the Legislature; Supreme Court justices, court of appeal justices, and superior court judges; candidates for those offices and their controlled committees; committees formed or existing primarily to support or oppose these candidates, elected officers, justices and judges, or statewide measures, or the qualification of state ballot measures; and all state general purpose committees and filers not specified in subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, shall file a campaign report with the Secretary of State by online or electronic means, as specified in Section 84605.(b) Elected officers in jurisdictions other than legislative districts, State Board of Equalization districts, or appellate court districts that contain parts of two or more counties, candidates for these offices, their controlled committees, and committees formed or existing primarily to support or oppose candidates or local measures to be voted upon in one of these jurisdictions shall file the original and, if the filing is in paper format, one copy with the elections official of the county with the largest number of registered voters in the jurisdiction. Elected officers, candidates for these offices, and their controlled committees shall also file a copy of their campaign reports with the elections official of the county in which the elected officer or candidate is domiciled, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 349 of the Elections Code.(c) County elected officers, candidates for these offices, their controlled committees, committees formed or existing primarily to support or oppose candidates or local measures to be voted upon in any number of jurisdictions within one county, other than those specified in subdivision (d), and county general purpose committees shall file the original and, if the filing is in paper format, one copy with the elections official of the county.(d) City elected officers, candidates for city office, their controlled committees, committees formed or existing primarily to support or oppose candidates or local measures to be voted upon in one city, and city general purpose committees shall file the original and, if the filing is in paper format, one copy with the clerk of the city.(e) Elected members of the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, elected members of the Teachers’ Retirement Board, candidates for these offices, their controlled committees, and committees formed or existing primarily to support or oppose these candidates or elected members shall file the original with the Secretary of State, and a copy shall be filed at the relevant board’s office in Sacramento.(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a committee, candidate, or elected officer is not required to file more than the original and one copy, or one copy, of a campaign report with any one county elections official or city clerk or with the Secretary of State.(g) If a committee is required to file campaign reports required by Section 84200 or 84200.5 in places designated in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, it shall continue to file these reports in those places, in addition to any other places required by this title, until the end of the calendar year.SEC. 38. Section 84218 of the Government Code is amended to read:84218. (a) A slate mailer organization shall file semiannual campaign reports no later than July 31 for the period ending June 30, and no later than January 31 for the period ending December 31.(b) In addition to the semiannual reports required by subdivision (a), a slate mailer organization which produces a slate mailer supporting or opposing candidates or measures being voted on in an election shall file the reports specified in Section 84200.8 if, during the period covered by the preelection report, the slate mailer organization receives payments totaling five hundred dollars ($500) or more from any person for the support of or opposition to candidates or ballot measures in one or more slate mailers, or expends five hundred dollars ($500) or more to produce one or more slate mailers.(c) A slate mailer organization shall file two copies of its campaign reports with the clerk of the county in which it is domiciled. A slate mailer organization is domiciled at the address listed on its registration unless it is domiciled outside California, in which case its domicile shall be deemed to be Los Angeles County for purposes of this section.In addition, slate mailer organizations shall file campaign reports as follows:(1) A slate mailer organization which produces one or more slate mailers supporting or opposing candidates or measures voted on in a state election, or in more than one county, shall file campaign reports in the same manner as state general purpose committees pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 84215.(2) A slate mailer organization which produces one or more slate mailers supporting or opposing candidates or measures voted on in only one county, or in more than one jurisdiction within one county, shall file campaign reports in the same manner as county general purpose committees pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 84215.(3) A slate mailer organization which produces one or more slate mailers supporting or opposing candidates or measures voted on in only one city shall file campaign reports in the same manner as city general purpose committees pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 84215.(4) Notwithstanding the above, no slate mailer organization shall be required to file more than the original and one copy, or two copies, of a campaign report with any one county or city clerk or with the Secretary of State.SEC. 39. Section 84219 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 167 of Chapter 50 of the Statutes of 2021, is amended to read:84219. Whenever a slate mailer organization is required to file campaign reports pursuant to Section 84218, the campaign report shall include the following information:(a) The total amount of receipts during the period covered by the campaign report and the total cumulative amount of receipts. For purposes of this section only, “receipts” means payments received by a slate mailer organization for production and distribution of slate mailers.(b) The total amount of disbursements made during the period covered by the campaign report and the total cumulative amount of disbursements. For purposes of this section only, “disbursements” means payment made by a slate mailer organization for the production or distribution of slate mailers.(c) For each candidate or committee that is a source of receipts totaling one hundred dollars ($100) or more during the period covered by the campaign report:(1) The name of the candidate or committee, identification of the jurisdiction and the office sought or ballot measure number or letter, and, if the source is a committee, the committee’s identification number, street address, and the name of the candidate or measure on whose behalf or in opposition to which the payment is made.(2) The date and amount received for each receipt totaling one hundred dollars ($100) or more during the period covered by the campaign report.(3) The cumulative amount of receipts on behalf of or in opposition to the candidate or measure.(d) For each person other than a candidate or committee who is a source of receipts totaling one hundred dollars ($100) or more during the period covered by the campaign report:(1) Identification of the jurisdiction, office or ballot measure, and name of the candidate or measure on whose behalf or in opposition to which the payment was made.(2) Full name, street address, name of employer, or, if self-employed, name of business of the source of receipts.(3) The date and amount received for each receipt totaling one hundred dollars ($100) or more during the period covered by the campaign report.(4) The cumulative amount of receipts on behalf of or in opposition to the candidate or measure.(e) For each candidate or ballot measure not reported pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d), but who was supported or opposed in a slate mailer sent by the slate mailer organization during the period covered by the report, identification of jurisdiction, office or ballot measure, and name of the candidate or measure who was supported or opposed.(f) The total amount of disbursements made during the period covered by the campaign report to persons who have received one hundred dollars ($100) or more.(g) The total amount of disbursements made during the period covered by the campaign report to persons who have received less than one hundred dollars ($100).(h) For each person to whom a disbursement of one hundred dollars ($100) or more has been made during the period covered by the campaign report:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) The date and amount of each disbursement.(4) A brief description of the consideration for which each disbursement was made.(5) The information required in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, for each person, if different from the payee, who has provided consideration for a disbursement of five hundred dollars ($500) or more during the period covered by the campaign report.(i) Cumulative disbursements, totaling one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more, made directly or indirectly to any person listed in the slate mailer organization’s registration. For purposes of this subdivision, a disbursement is made indirectly to a person if it is intended for the benefit of or use by that person or a member of the person’s immediate family, or if it is made to a business entity in which the person or member of the person’s immediate family is a partner, shareholder, owner, director, trustee, officer, employee, consultant, or holds any position of management or in which the person or member of the person’s immediate family has an investment of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more. This subdivision does not apply to any disbursement made to a business entity whose securities are publicly traded.(j) The full name, street address, email address, and telephone number of the slate mailer organization and of the treasurer.(k) Whenever a slate mailer organization also qualifies as a general purpose committee pursuant to Section 82027.5, the campaign report shall include, in addition to the information required by this section, the information required by Section 84211.SEC. 40. Section 84222 of the Government Code is amended to read:84222. (a) For purposes of this title, “multipurpose organization” means an organization described in Sections 501(c)(3) to 501(c)(10), inclusive, of the Internal Revenue Code and that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, a federal or out-of-state political organization, a trade association, a professional association, a civic organization, a religious organization, a fraternal society, an educational institution, or any other association or group of persons acting in concert, that is operating for purposes other than making contributions or expenditures. “Multipurpose organization” does not include a business entity, an individual, or a federal candidate’s authorized committee, as defined in Section 30101 of Title 52 of the United States Code, that is registered and filing reports pursuant to the Federal Election Campaign Act of 1971 (Public Law 92-225).(b) A multipurpose organization that makes expenditures or contributions and does not qualify as a committee pursuant to subdivision (c) may qualify as an independent expenditure committee or major donor committee if the multipurpose organization satisfies subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013.(c) Except as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5), a multipurpose organization is a recipient committee within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 82013 only under one or more of the following circumstances:(1) The multipurpose organization is a political committee registered with the Federal Election Commission, except as provided in subdivision (a) of this section, or a political committee registered with another state, and the multipurpose organization makes contributions or expenditures in this state in an amount equal to or greater than the amount identified in subdivision (a) of Section 82013.(2) The multipurpose organization solicits and receives payments from donors in an amount equal to or greater than the amount identified in subdivision (a) of Section 82013 for the purpose of making contributions or expenditures.(3) The multipurpose organization accepts payments from donors in an amount equal to or greater than the amount identified in subdivision (a) of Section 82013 subject to a condition, agreement, or understanding with the donor that all or a portion of the payments may be used for making contributions or expenditures.(4) The multipurpose organization has existing funds from a donor and a subsequent agreement or understanding is reached with the donor that all or a portion of the funds may be used for making contributions or expenditures in an amount equal to or greater than the amount identified in subdivision (a) of Section 82013. The date of the subsequent agreement or understanding is deemed to be the date of receipt of the payment.(5) The multipurpose organization makes contributions or expenditures totaling more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in a period of 12 months or more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in a period of four consecutive calendar years.(A) A multipurpose organization shall not qualify as a committee within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 82013 pursuant to this paragraph if the multipurpose organization makes contributions or expenditures using only available nondonor funds. A multipurpose organization that makes contributions or expenditures with nondonor funds shall briefly describe the source of the funds used on its major donor or independent expenditure report.(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “nondonor funds” means investment income, including capital gains, or income earned from providing goods, services, or facilities, whether related or unrelated to the multipurpose organization’s program, sale of assets, or other receipts that are not donations.(d) A multipurpose organization that is a committee pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall comply with the registration and reporting requirements of this chapter, subject to the following:(1) The multipurpose organization is not required to comply with subdivision (k) of Section 84211 for contributions and expenditures made to influence federal or out-of-state elections, which shall instead be reported as a single expenditure and be described as such on the campaign report.(2) A multipurpose organization registered with the Federal Election Commission is not subject to subdivisions (d) and (f) of Section 84211 but shall disclose the total amount of contributions received pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 84211, and shall disclose the multipurpose organization’s name and identification number registered with the Federal Election Commission on the campaign report.(e) (1) A multipurpose organization that is a committee pursuant to paragraph (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (c) shall comply with the registration and reporting requirements of this chapter, subject to the following, except that if the multipurpose organization is the sponsor of a committee as described in subdivision (f) it may report required information on its sponsored committee report pursuant to subdivision (f):(A) The multipurpose organization shall register in the calendar year in which it satisfies any of the criteria in subdivision (c). The registration filed pursuant to Section 84101 shall indicate that the organization is filing pursuant to this section as a multipurpose organization and state the organization’s nonprofit tax exempt status, if any. The registration shall also describe the organization’s mission or most significant activities, and describe the organization’s political activities. A multipurpose organization may comply with the requirement to describe the mission or significant activities and political activities by referencing where the organization’s Internal Revenue Service Return of Organization Exempt From Income Tax form may be accessed.(B) Except as provided in this subparagraph, the registration of a multipurpose organization that meets the criteria of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) shall terminate automatically on December 31 of the calendar year in which the multipurpose organization is registered. The multipurpose organization shall not be required to file a semiannual report pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 84200, unless the multipurpose organization has undisclosed contributions or expenditures to report, in which case termination shall occur automatically upon filing the semiannual report that is due no later than January 31. After the multipurpose organization’s registration has terminated, the multipurpose organization’s reporting obligations are complete, unless the organization qualifies as a committee for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 82013 again in the following calendar year pursuant to subdivision (c) of this section. Notwithstanding this subdivision, a multipurpose organization may elect to remain registered as a committee by submitting written notification to the Secretary of State prior to the end of the calendar year.(C) A multipurpose organization shall report all contributions received that satisfy the criteria of paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (c) of this section in the manner required by subdivision (f) of Section 84211, and for the balance of its contributions or expenditures shall further report contributors based on a last in, first out accounting method.(2) A multipurpose organization reporting pursuant to this subdivision shall disclose total contributions received in an amount equal to the multipurpose organization’s total contributions and expenditures made in the reporting period. When a multipurpose organization reports donors based on the last in, first out accounting method, it shall attribute to and include the information required by subdivision (f) of Section 84211 for any donor who donates one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more in a calendar year, except for the following:(A) A donor who designates or restricts the donation for purposes other than contributions or expenditures.(B) A donor who prohibits the multipurpose organization’s use of its donation for contributions or expenditures.(C) A private foundation, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code, that provides a grant that does not constitute a taxable expenditure for purposes of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 4945 of the Internal Revenue Code.(3) A multipurpose organization that qualifies as a committee pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) shall not be required to include contributions or expenditures made in a prior calendar year on the reports filed for the calendar year in which the multipurpose organization qualifies as a committee.(4) If a multipurpose organization qualifies as a committee solely pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) and the committee is required to report donors based on a last in, first out accounting method pursuant to paragraph (1), the multipurpose organization shall not be required to disclose donor information for a donation received by the multipurpose organization prior to July 1, 2014. This paragraph shall not apply with respect to a donation made by a donor who knew that the multipurpose organization would use the donation to support or oppose a candidate or ballot measure in the state by requesting that the donation be used for that purpose or by making the donation in response to a message or solicitation indicating the multipurpose organization’s intent to use the donation for that purpose.(5) A contributor identified and reported in the manner provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) that is a multipurpose organization and receives contributions that satisfy the criteria in subdivision (c) shall be subject to the requirements of this subdivision.(6) The commission shall adopt regulations establishing notice requirements and reasonable filing deadlines for donors reported as contributors based on the last in, first out accounting method.(f) A multipurpose organization that is the sponsor of a committee as defined in Section 82048.7, that is a membership organization, that makes all of its contributions and expenditures from funds derived from dues, assessments, fees, and similar payments that do not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per calendar year from a single source, and that elects to report its contributions and expenditures on its sponsored committee’s campaign report pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) shall report as follows:(1) The sponsored committee shall report all contributions and expenditures made from the sponsor’s treasury funds on reports filed by the committee. The sponsor shall use a last in, first out accounting method and disclose the information required by subdivision (f) of Section 84211 for any person who pays dues, assessments, fees, or similar payments of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more to the sponsor’s treasury funds in a calendar year and shall disclose all contributions and expenditures made, as required by subdivision (k) of Section 84211, on the sponsored committee’s campaign reports.(2) The sponsored committee shall report all other contributions and expenditures in support of the committee by the sponsor, its intermediate units, and the members of those entities. A sponsoring organization makes contributions and expenditures in support of its sponsored committee when it provides the committee with money from its treasury funds, with the exception of establishment or administrative costs. With respect to dues, assessments, fees, and similar payments channeled through the sponsor or an intermediate unit to a sponsored committee, the original source of the dues, assessments, fees, and similar payments is the contributor.(3) A responsible officer of the sponsor, as well as the treasurer of the sponsored committee, shall verify the committee’s campaign report pursuant to Section 81004.(g) For purposes of this section, “last in, first out accounting method” means an accounting method by which contributions and expenditures are attributed to the multipurpose organization’s contributors in reverse chronological order beginning with the most recent of its contributors or, if there are any prior contributions or expenditures, beginning with the most recent contributor for which unattributed contributions remain.SEC. 41. Section 84223 of the Government Code, as added by Section 13 of Chapter 312 of the Statutes of 2019, is amended to read:84223. (a) For a committee primarily formed to support or oppose a state ballot measure or state candidate that raises one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more for an election, the Secretary of State shall maintain an accurate list of the committee’s top 10 contributors, as specified by Commission regulations. The list shall be based on the filer’s campaign reports. A current list of the top 10 contributors shall be posted on the Secretary of State’s internet website, as provided in subdivision (c).(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (4), the list of top 10 contributors shall identify the names of the 10 persons who have made the largest cumulative contributions to the committee, the total amount of each person’s contributions, the city and state of the person, the person’s committee identification number, if any, and any other information deemed necessary by the Commission. If any of the top 10 contributors identified on the list are committees pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013, the Commission may require, by regulation, that the list also identify the top 10 contributors to those contributing committees.(2) (A) For a committee primarily formed to support or oppose a state ballot measure, the cumulative amount of contributions received by the committee from a person for the period beginning 12 months prior to the date the committee made its first expenditure to qualify, support, or oppose the measure and ending with the current date shall be counted.(B) For a committee primarily formed to support or oppose a state candidate, the cumulative amount of contributions received by the committee from a person for the primary and general elections combined shall be counted.(3) The aggregation rules of Section 82015.5 and any implementing regulations adopted by the Commission shall apply in identifying the persons who have made the top 10 cumulative contributions to a committee.(4) A person who makes contributions to a committee in a cumulative amount of less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall not be identified or disclosed as a top 10 contributor to a committee pursuant to this section.(c) (1) The Commission shall adopt regulations to govern the manner in which the Secretary of State shall display top 10 contributor lists maintained for a committee that is subject to this section, and the Secretary of State shall post the top 10 contributor lists on its internet website in the manner prescribed by those regulations.(2) A committee’s top 10 contributor list shall be updated when any of the following occurs:(A) A new person qualifies as a top 10 contributor to the committee.(B) A person who is an existing top 10 contributor makes additional contributions to the committee.(C) A change occurs that alters the relative ranking order of the top 10 contributors.(3) The 10 persons who have made the largest cumulative contributions to a committee shall be listed in order from largest contribution amount to smallest amount. If two or more contributors of identical amounts meet the threshold for inclusion in the list of top 10 contributors, the order of disclosure shall be made beginning with the most recent contributor of that amount.(4) The Secretary of State shall post or update a top 10 contributor list within five business days or, during the 16 days before the election, within 48 hours of receiving data of a contributor qualifying for the list or of any change to the list.(d) In addition to any other lists that the Secretary of State is required to post on its internet website, the Secretary of State shall compile, maintain, and display on its internet website a current list of the top 10 contributors supporting and opposing each state ballot measure, as prescribed by Commission regulations.(e) This section shall not become operative until the Secretary of State certifies an online filing and disclosure system pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 84602 of the Government Code.SEC. 42. Section 84224 of the Government Code is amended to read:84224. (a) A behested payment described in subdivision (b) shall be reported within 30 days following the date on which the payment or payments equal or exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in the aggregate from the same source in the same calendar year in which they are made. The report shall be filed by the behesting officer or member of the Public Utilities Commission with the officer’s or member’s agency and is a public record subject to inspection and copying pursuant to Section 81008. The report shall contain all of the following information: name of payor; address of payor; amount of the payment or payments; date or dates the payment or payments were made; the name and address of the payee; a brief description of the goods or services provided or purchased, if any; and a description of the specific purpose or event for which the payment or payments were made. Once the five-thousand-dollar ($5,000) aggregate threshold from a single source has been reached for a calendar year, all payments for the calendar year made by that source shall be disclosed within 30 days after the date the threshold was reached or the payment was made, whichever occurs later. Within 30 days after receipt of the report, state agencies, including the Public Utilities Commission, shall forward a copy of these reports to the Fair Political Practices Commission, and local agencies shall forward a copy of these reports to the officer with whom elected officers of that agency file their campaign reports.(b) The reporting requirement imposed by this section applies to a behested payment that satisfies each of the following:(1) The payment is made at the behest of an elected officer or member of the Public Utilities Commission.(2) The behesting elected officer or member of the Public Utilities Commission does not provide full and adequate consideration in exchange for the payment.(3) The payment is made principally for a legislative, governmental, or charitable purpose.(4) If made principally for a legislative or governmental purpose, the payment is made by a person other than a state, local, or federal governmental agency.SEC. 42.5. Section 84224 of the Government Code is amended to read:84224. (a) A behested payment described in subdivision (b) shall be reported within 30 days following the date on which the payment or payments equal or exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in the aggregate from the same source in the same calendar year in which they are made. The report shall be filed by the behesting officer or member of the Public Utilities Commission with the officer’s or member’s agency and is a public record subject to inspection and copying pursuant to Section 81008. The report shall contain all of the following information: name of payor; address of payor; amount of the payment or payments; date or dates the payment or payments were made; the name and address of the payee; a brief description of the goods or services provided or purchased, if any; and a description of the specific purpose or event for which the payment or payments were made. Once the five-thousand-dollar ($5,000) aggregate threshold from a single source has been reached for a calendar year, all payments for the calendar year made by that source shall be disclosed within 30 days after the date the threshold was reached or the payment was made, whichever occurs later. Within 30 days after receipt of the report, state agencies, including the Public Utilities Commission, shall forward a copy of these reports to the Fair Political Practices Commission, and local agencies shall forward a copy of these reports to the officer with whom elected officers of that agency file their campaign reports.(b) The reporting requirement imposed by this section applies to a behested payment that satisfies each of the following:(1) The payment is made at the behest of an elected officer or member of the Public Utilities Commission.(2) The behesting elected officer or member of the Public Utilities Commission does not provide full and adequate consideration in exchange for the payment.(3) The payment is made principally for a legislative, governmental, or charitable purpose.(4) If made principally for a legislative or governmental purpose, the payment is made by a person other than a state, local, or federal governmental agency.(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a report is not required if the payment results from an officer or member of the Public Utilities Commission making a public appeal for payment by any of the following means:(A) Television.(B) Radio.(C) Billboard.(D) A public message on an online platform.(E) A public speech, unless the speech is given at an event that the officer or member knows is being held for the purpose of raising funds for the recipient organization and any of the following apply:(i) The officer or member consents in advance to be a speaker.(ii) The officer or member consents to be featured in a solicitation.(iii) The officer or member publicly solicits contributions to the recipient organization.(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply if either of the following conditions is satisfied:(A) The payee organization is not a governmental agency and the elected officer or member of the Public Utilities Commission knows that they, or a member of their immediate family, campaign staff, or officeholder staff, holds a position, including any of the following, with that payee organization:(i) Any position with decisionmaking capacity within the organization, such as a board member or executive officer position.(ii) Salaried employment at the organization.(iii) Status as a founding member of the organization.(iv) A position on an honorary or advisory board of the organization.(B) The behesting officer or member of the Public Utilities Commission knows, within two years of the payment, that a specific payment was made in response to the officer or member’s public appeal.(3) If an officer or member of the Public Utilities Commission does not know at the time that a payment was made in response to their public appeal, the deadline described in subdivision (a) shall commence on the date that the officer or member first learns that the payment was made in response to that public appeal.SEC. 43. Section 84226 of the Government Code is amended to read:84226. (a) This section applies to any elected local government officer or candidate for elective local government office who meets both of the following criteria:(1) The officer or candidate is required to file a report or other document required by this chapter, with their local filing officer or otherwise, but whose filing requirements do not include filing with the Secretary of State.(2) The officer or candidate has received campaign contributions to support their candidacy for office in an upcoming election that equal or exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and subject to paragraph (2) of this subdivision and subdivisions (c) and (d), an elected local government officer or candidate for elective local government office specified in subdivision (a) shall, in addition to filing with any other person required by this title, file a copy of a report or other document specified in Section 84200, 84200.5, 84203, or 84204 online or electronically with the Secretary of State through the online filing and disclosure system specified in subdivision (b) of Section 84602.(2) An elected local government officer or candidate for elective local government office specified in subdivision (a) is required to file a copy of a report or other document online or electronically with the Secretary of State pursuant to paragraph (1) only if the persons specified in subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 84215 are also required to file that same category of report or other document online or electronically with the Secretary of State.(c) By the first January 1st after the date the Secretary of State certifies an online filing and disclosure system pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 84602, the Secretary of State shall submit a report to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 that specifies the changes to that system, if any, that are required to accommodate filings by local officers and candidates pursuant to this section. The report shall include a date by which the Secretary of State expects to certify that those changes have been made. In preparing this report, the Secretary of State shall consult with the Fair Political Practices Commission and the Department of Technology.(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall become operative on the first January 1st after the date the Secretary of State certifies that the changes specified in the report described in subdivision (c) have been made.SEC. 44. Section 84252 of the Government Code is amended to read:84252. A committee primarily formed to support or oppose a LAFCO proposal shall file all reports required under this chapter except that, in lieu of the reports required by Sections 84200 and 84202.3, the committee shall file monthly campaign reports from the time circulation of a petition begins until a measure is placed on the ballot or, if a measure is not placed on the ballot, until the committee is terminated pursuant to Section 84214. The committee shall file an original and one copy of each report on the 15th day of each calendar month, covering the prior calendar month, with the clerk of the county in which the measure may be voted on. If the petition results in a measure that is placed on the ballot, the committee thereafter shall file campaign reports required by this chapter.SEC. 45. Section 84300 of the Government Code is amended to read:84300. (a) No contribution of one hundred dollars ($100) or more shall be made or received in cash.A cash contribution shall not be deemed received if it is not negotiated or deposited and is returned to the contributor before the closing date of the campaign report on which the contribution would otherwise be reported. If a cash contribution, other than a late contribution, as defined in Section 82036, is negotiated or deposited, it shall not be deemed received if it is refunded within 72 hours of receipt. In the case of a late contribution, as defined in Section 82036, it shall not be deemed received if it is returned to the contributor within 48 hours of receipt.(b) No expenditure of one hundred dollars ($100) or more shall be made in cash.(c) No contribution of one hundred dollars ($100) or more other than an in-kind contribution shall be made unless in the form of a written instrument containing the name of the donor and the name of the payee and drawn from the account of the donor or the intermediary, as defined in Section 84302.(d) The value of all in-kind contributions of one hundred dollars ($100) or more shall be reported in writing to the recipient upon the request in writing of the recipient.SEC. 46. Section 84302 of the Government Code is amended to read:84302. A person shall not make a contribution on behalf of another, or while acting as the intermediary or agent of another, without disclosing to the recipient of the contribution both that person’s own full name and street address, occupation, and the name of that person’s employer, if any, or that person’s principal place of business if that person is self-employed, and the full name and street address, occupation, and the name of employer, if any, or principal place of business if self-employed, of the other person for whom the contribution is made. The recipient of the contribution shall include in the recipient’s campaign report the full name and street address, occupation, and the name of the employer, if any, or the principal place of business if self-employed, of both the intermediary and the contributor.SEC. 47. Section 84303 of the Government Code is amended to read:84303. (a) An expenditure of five hundred dollars ($500) or more shall not be made, other than for overhead or normal operating expenses, by an agent or independent contractor, including, but not limited to, an advertising agency, on behalf of or for the benefit of a candidate or committee unless it is reported by the candidate or committee as if the expenditure were made directly by the candidate or committee.(b) A subagent or subcontractor who provides goods or services to or for the benefit of a candidate or committee shall make known to the agent or independent contractor all of the information required to be reported by this section, and the agent or independent contractor shall then make known to the candidate or committee all of the information required to be reported by this section no later than three working days prior to the time the campaign report reporting the expenditure is required to be filed, except that an expenditure that is required to be reported by Section 84203 or 84204 shall be reported to the candidate or committee within 24 hours of the time that it is made.SEC. 48. Section 84306 of the Government Code is amended to read:84306. All contributions received by a person acting as an agent of a candidate shall be reported promptly to the candidate or any of the candidate’s designated agents. All contributions received by a person acting as an agent of a committee shall be reported promptly to the committee’s treasurer or any of the treasurer’s designated agents. “Promptly” as used in this section means not later than the closing date of any campaign report the committee or candidate for whom the contribution is intended is required to file.SEC. 49. Section 84502 of the Government Code is amended to read:84502. (a) (1) Any advertisement not described in subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3 that is paid for by a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013, other than a political party committee or a candidate controlled committee established for an elective office of the controlling candidate, shall include the words “Ad paid for by” followed by the name of the committee as it appears on the most recent committee registration filed pursuant to Section 84101.(2) Any advertisement not described in subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3 that is paid for by a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 that is a political party committee or a candidate controlled committee established for an elective office of the controlling candidate shall include the words “Ad paid for by” followed by the name of the committee as it appears on the most recent committee registration filed pursuant to Section 84101 if the advertisement is any of the following:(A) Paid for by an independent expenditure.(B) An advertisement supporting or opposing a ballot measure.(C) A radio or television advertisement.(D) A text message advertisement that is required to include a disclosure pursuant to Section 84504.7.(b) Any advertisement not described in subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3 that is paid for by a committee pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013 shall include the words “Ad paid for by” followed by the name that the filer is required to use on campaign reports pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 84211.(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if an advertisement is a printed letter, internet website, or email message, the text described in subdivisions (a) and (b) may include the words “Paid for by” instead of “Ad paid for by.”(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if an advertisement is a text message, the text described in subdivisions (a) and (b) may include the words “Paid for by” or “With,” instead of “Ad paid for by.”(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if an advertisement is a video advertisement that is disseminated over the internet, is a print advertisement that is larger than those designed to be individually distributed subject to subdivision (b) of Section 84504.2, is an electronic media advertisement subject to subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3, or is a text message advertisement subject to Section 84504.7, then the text for the name of the committee may be shortened by either of the following:(1) Displaying only enough of the first part of the committee name to uniquely identify the committee. If the committee is a sponsored committee, then the name displayed must include the portion of the committee name that identifies the sponsor or sponsors, unless all of the sponsors are disclosed on the ad as top contributors as required by Section 84503. For example, if ACME Corporation is not listed as a top contributor, then a committee named “Yes on 99, Californians for a Better Tomorrow, a coalition of X, Y, and Z. Sponsored by ACME Corporation” may be disclosed as only “Yes on 99, Californians for a Better Tomorrow. Sponsored by ACME Corporation.”(2) If the advertisement is paid for by a committee that has top contributors and is subject to Section 84503, then the committee name may be replaced by displaying the words “Committee ID” followed by the committee’s identification number.SEC. 50. Section 84504.6 of the Government Code is amended to read:84504.6. (a) For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Online platform” means a public-facing internet website, web application, or digital application, including a social network, ad network, or search engine, that sells advertisements directly to advertisers. A public-facing internet website, web application, or digital application is not an online platform for purposes of this article to the extent that it displays advertisements that are sold directly to advertisers through another online platform.(2) (A) “Online platform disclosed advertisement” means either of the following:(i) A paid electronic media advertisement on an online platform made via a form of electronic media that allows users to engage in discourse and post content, or any other type of social media, for which the committee pays the online platform, unless all advertisements on the platform are video advertisements that can comply with Section 84504.1. Individual posts, comments, or other similar communications are not considered online platform disclosed advertisements if they are posted without payment to the online platform.(ii) A paid electronic media advertisement on an online platform that is not any of the following:(I) A graphic, image, animated graphic, or animated image that the online platform hosting the advertisement allows to hyperlink to an internet website containing required disclosures, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3.(II) Video, audio, or email.(B) Electronic media advertisements that are not online platform disclosed advertisements as defined in subparagraph (A) shall follow disclosure requirements for electronic media advertisements under Section 84504.3.(b) A committee that disseminates an online platform disclosed advertisement shall do all of the following:(1) Upon requesting the dissemination, expressly notify the online platform through which the advertisement would be disseminated, using the online platform’s chosen notification method, that the advertisement is an advertisement as defined in Section 84501.(2) (A) Provide the online platform with the disclosure name of the committee.(B) For purposes of this section, “disclosure name” means the text required by Section 84503, followed by a colon, followed by, surrounded in quotation marks, the name of the committee as it appears on the most recent committee registration filed pursuant to Section 84101 or the name that the filer is required to use on campaign reports pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 84211. If no disclosure text is required by Section 84503, “disclosure name” means the name of the committee as it appears on the most recent committee registration filed pursuant to Section 84101 or the name that the filer is required to use on campaign reports pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 84211.(C) If the disclosure name changes due to a change in the top contributors or the name of the committee, the committee shall provide the online platform with an updated disclosure name within five business days.(3) Provide the online platform with the name of the candidate to which the advertisement refers and the office to which the candidate is seeking election, as applicable, or number or letter of the ballot measure and the jurisdiction to which the advertisement refers.(4) Provide the online platform with the name and identification number of the committee that paid for the advertisement.(c) An online platform that disseminates a committee’s online platform disclosed advertisement shall do one of the following:(1) Display “Paid for by” or “Ad Paid for by” followed by the disclosure name provided by the committee, easily readable to the average viewer, located adjacent to any text stating that the advertisement is an advertisement or is promoted or sponsored. The online platform may display only one hundred or more characters of the disclosure name if it is followed by a “…” that is clearly clickable and that links to a page as described in paragraph (3).(2) The online platform may instead display a hyperlink, icon, button, or tab with the text “Who funded this ad?,” “Paid for by,” or “Ad Paid for by” that is clearly clickable in the same or similar font and in at least the same font size as the online platform’s text, and easily readable to the average viewer, stating that the advertisement is an advertisement or is promoted or sponsored, that links to a page as described in paragraph (3).(3) Hyperlinks, icons, buttons, or tabs used for the purposes described in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be linked to the profile or landing page of the committee that paid for the advertisement; to another page to which the average viewer would normally navigate to view additional information about a committee containing the disclosure name in a manner that is easily seen and readable by the average viewer; or to an internet website containing the disclosure required by subdivision (d) of Section 84504.3.(d) An online platform that disseminates committees’ online platform disclosed advertisements shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) Maintain, and make available for online public inspection in a machine readable format, a record of any advertisement disseminated on the online platform by a committee that purchased five hundred dollars ($500) or more in advertisements on the online platform during the preceding 12 months. Each record shall contain all of the following:(A) A digital copy of the advertisement.(B) The approximate number of views generated from the advertisement and the date and time that the advertisement was first displayed and last displayed.(C) Information regarding the range charged or the total amount spent on the advertisement.(D) The name of the candidate to which the advertisement refers and the office to which the candidate is seeking election, as applicable, or number or letter of the ballot measure and the jurisdiction to which the advertisement refers.(E) The name and identification number of the committee that paid for the advertisement, if the committee is assigned an identification number.(2) The information required under this subdivision shall be made available as soon as practicable and shall be retained by the online platform for no less than four years.(3) (A) Display a prominent button, icon, tab, or hyperlink with the text “View Ads” or similar text in one of the following locations: (i) near the top of a profile, landing page, or similar location of a committee that paid for an advertisement in a position that the average viewer will readily see it upon viewing that page; (ii) on a page that displays the committee’s profile information or biographical information; (iii) or on a page on which the average viewer would normally navigate to view additional information about a committee.(B) The button, icon, tab, or hyperlink shall link to a page clearly showing all of the advertisement records required by paragraph (1).(e) An online platform that creates a mechanism for a committee requesting dissemination of an online platform disclosed advertisement to expressly notify the online platform whether the advertisement is an advertisement as defined in Section 84501 and to provide all information necessary for the online platform to comply with the requirements of this section may rely in good faith on the information provided by the committee to the online platform to satisfy the online platform’s obligations under subdivisions (c) and (d).SEC. 51. Section 84602 of the Government Code is amended to read:84602. (a) To implement the Legislature’s intent, the Secretary of State, in consultation with the Commission, notwithstanding any other provision of this code, shall do all of the following:(1) Develop online and electronic filing processes for use by persons and entities specified in Section 84605 that are required to file statements and reports with the Secretary of State’s office pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 84100), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 85100), and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 86100). Those processes shall each enable a user to comply with all of the disclosure requirements of this title and shall include, at a minimum, both of the following:(A) A means or method whereby filers subject to this chapter may submit required filings free of charge. Any means or method developed pursuant to this subparagraph shall not provide any additional or enhanced functions or services that exceed the minimum requirements necessary to fulfill the disclosure provisions of this title.(B) The definition of a nonproprietary standardized record format or formats using industry standards for the transmission of the data that is required of those persons and entities specified in Section 84605 and that conforms with the disclosure requirements of this title. The Secretary of State shall hold public hearings before development of the record format or formats as a means to ensure that affected entities have an opportunity to provide input into the development process.(2) Accept test files from software vendors and others wishing to file reports electronically, for the purpose of determining whether the file format is in compliance with the standardized record format developed pursuant to paragraph (1) and is compatible with the Secretary of State’s system for receiving the data. A list of the software and service providers who have submitted acceptable test files shall be published by the Secretary of State and made available to the public. Acceptably formatted files shall be submitted by a filer in order to meet the requirements of this chapter.(3) Develop a system that provides for the online or electronic transfer of the data specified in this section using telecommunications technology that ensures the integrity of the data transmitted and that creates safeguards against efforts to tamper with or subvert the data.(4) Make all the data filed available online in an easily understood format that provides the greatest public access. The data shall be made available free of charge and as soon as possible after receipt. All late contribution and late independent expenditure reports, as defined by Sections 84203 and 84204, respectively, shall be made available online within 24 hours of receipt. The data made available online shall not contain the street name and building number of the persons or entity representatives listed on the electronically filed forms or any bank account number required to be disclosed pursuant to this title.(5) Develop a procedure for filers to comply with the requirement that they sign under penalty of perjury pursuant to Section 81004.(6) Maintain all filed data online for 10 years after the date it is filed, and then archive the information in a secure format.(7) Provide assistance to those seeking public access to the information.(8) Implement sufficient technology to seek to prevent unauthorized alteration or manipulation of the data.(9) Provide the Commission with necessary information to enable it to assist agencies, public officials, and others with the compliance with, and administration of, this title.(b) (1) To implement the Legislature’s intent, as described in Section 84601, the Secretary of State, in consultation with the Commission, shall develop an online filing and disclosure system for use by persons and entities specified in Section 84605 that are required to file statements and reports with the Secretary of State’s office pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 84100), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 85100), and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 86100). The system shall enable a user to comply with all of the disclosure requirements of this title and shall include, at minimum, all of the following:(A) A data-driven means or method that allows filers subject to this chapter to submit required filings free of charge in a manner that facilitates public searches of the data and does all of the following:(i) Enables a filer to comply with all of the disclosure requirements of this title, including by entering or uploading requisite data or by indicating that the filer had no reportable activity during a particular reporting period.(ii) Retains previously submitted data so that a filer can access that data to amend disclosures or prepare future disclosures. The system shall permit a filer to enter a contribution or independent expenditure transaction once and have the transaction appear on both a transactional report required by Section 84203, 84204, 84204.5, 84309, or 85500 and a periodic campaign report required by this title.(iii) Ensures the security of data entered and stored in the system.(iv) To the extent feasible, is compatible with potential future capability to accept reports from filers specified in subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, of Section 84215.(B) The definition of a nonproprietary standardized record format or formats using industry standards for the transmission of the data that is required of those persons and entities specified in Section 84605 and that conforms with the disclosure requirements of this title.(2) The Secretary of State shall do all of the following with respect to the online filing and disclosure system developed pursuant to this subdivision:(A) Accept test files from software vendors and others wishing to file reports electronically for the purpose of determining whether the file format is in compliance with the standardized record format developed pursuant to this subdivision and is compatible with the Secretary of State’s system for receiving the data. The Secretary of State shall publish and make available to the public a list of the software and service providers who have submitted acceptable test files. A filer shall submit acceptably formatted files in order to meet the requirements of this chapter.(B) Make the data filed available online as follows:(i) In a user-friendly, easily understandable format that provides the greatest public access, including online searches and machine-readable downloads of all data contained in the system, except as specified in clause (iii).(ii) Free of charge and as soon as possible after receipt, or, in the case of late contribution, late in-kind contribution, and late independent expenditure reports, as defined by Sections 84203, 84203.3, and 84204, respectively, within 24 hours of receipt.(iii) Not containing the street name or building number of the persons or entity representatives listed on the electronically filed forms or any bank account number required to be disclosed pursuant to this title, except that a nonresidential address of a committee under Section 82013 may be made available online.(iv) In a manner that allows the public to track and aggregate contributions from the same contributor across filers using a permanent unique identifier assigned by the Secretary of State for this purpose. The Secretary of State shall assign this identifier to, at minimum, each contributor who makes contributions totaling ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more in a calendar year to, or at the behest of, candidates or committees that file electronically with the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 84215 or who files with the Secretary of State as a major donor committee under subdivision (c) of Section 82013.(C) Develop a procedure for filers to comply electronically with the requirement to sign under penalty of perjury pursuant to Section 81004. The electronic signature procedure shall allow the filer to file with the Secretary of State and shall not require an original signature to be filed.(D) Maintain all filed data online for at least 20 years after the date it is filed, and then archive the information in a secure format.(E) Provide assistance to those seeking public access to the information.(F) Implement sufficient technology to seek to prevent unauthorized alteration or manipulation of the data.(G) Provide the Commission with necessary information to enable it to assist agencies, public officials, and others in complying with and administering this title.(3) The Secretary of State shall do all of the following with respect to developing the online filing and disclosure system and record format pursuant to this subdivision:(A) Consult with the Assembly Committee on Elections and Redistricting, the Senate Committee on Elections and Constitutional Amendments, the Commission, users, filers, and other stakeholders, as appropriate, about functions of the online filing and disclosure system.(B) In consultation with the Commission, and no later than July 31, 2017, hold at least one public hearing to receive input about developing the online filing and disclosure system and record format.(C) No later than December 31, 2017, submit a report to the Assembly Committee on Elections and Redistricting and the Senate Committee on Elections and Constitutional Amendments that includes a plan for the online filing and disclosure system, describes how members of the public will be able to query and retrieve data from the system, and includes a plan for integrating statements as specified in clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).(4) The Secretary of State shall make the online filing and disclosure system developed pursuant to this subdivision available for use no later than February 2021.(5) The Secretary of State may accept any funds, services, equipment, or grants to further this subdivision, provided that the Secretary of State shall notify the Assembly Committee on Elections and Redistricting and the Senate Committee on Elections and Constitutional Amendments upon accepting any amount valued at one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more.(6) Because the provisions of this chapter need to be implemented as expeditiously as possible, the information technology procurement requirements described in Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 11545) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of this code, and in Section 12100 of the Public Contract Code, do not apply to development of the online filing and disclosure system pursuant to this subdivision. The Secretary of State shall consult with the Department of Technology, as appropriate, in developing the online filing and disclosure system, in order to maximize project success, minimize life-cycle costs, and ensure the security of the system and its data.(7) (A) Before making the system developed pursuant to this subdivision available for public use, the Secretary of State, in consultation with the Commission, shall test the system to ensure its functionality and then certify that the system meets all the requirements of this subdivision. The Secretary of State may consult with the Department of Technology as needed to fulfill the secretary’s duties under this paragraph.(B) After the system developed pursuant to this subdivision is certified, the system described in subdivision (a) shall no longer accept reports and filings, unless otherwise directed by the Secretary of State and the Commission. The system described in subdivision (a) shall continue to allow public access to past disclosures unless the Secretary of State migrates that data into the system described in this subdivision. To facilitate data conversion during migration, the Secretary of State may make minor technical modifications or corrections to the migrated data.(c)  On or before December 31, 2017, and on or before every April 15, July 15, October 15, and January 15 thereafter, the Secretary of State shall submit to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the fiscal committees of the Legislature a quarterly report on the progress of the Cal-Access Project. Specifically, the Secretary of State shall certify whether the secretary (1) anticipates making or has made any changes to the project’s scope, schedule, or budget and (2) considers any problems to be a risk to the project’s completion according to the approved project schedule and budget. This reporting requirement shall end upon the completion or termination of the Cal-Access Project.SEC. 52. Section 84603 of the Government Code is repealed.SEC. 53. Section 84605 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 500 of the Statutes of 2022, is amended to read:84605. (a) The following persons shall file online or electronically with the Secretary of State:(1) Any candidate, including superior court, appellate court, and Supreme Court candidates and officeholders, committee, or other persons who are required, pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 84100) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 85100), to file statements, reports, or other documents in connection with a state elective office or state measure.(2) Any state general purpose committees, as defined in Section 82027.5, including the general purpose committees of political parties, as defined in Section 85205, and small contributor committees, as defined in Section 85203.(3) Any slate mailer organization that produces one or more slate mailers supporting or opposing candidates or measures voted on in a state election or in more than one county.(4) Any lobbyist, lobbying firm, lobbyist employer, or other persons required, pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 86100), to file statements, reports, or other documents.(5) Any elected local government officer or candidate for elective local government office filing with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 84226.(b) The Secretary of State shall also disclose online any late contribution or late independent expenditure report, as defined by Sections 84203 and 84204, respectively, not covered by paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) or any other provision of law.(c) It shall be presumed that online or electronic filers file under penalty of perjury.(d) The Secretary of State shall maintain at all times a secured, official version of all original online and electronically filed statements and reports required by this chapter, which shall be the official version for audit and other legal purposes.(e) Except for statements related to a local elective office or a local ballot measure filed by a candidate for local elective office who is also a candidate for elective state office, and for filings subject to Section 84226, a copy of a statement, report, or other document filed by online or electronic means with the Secretary of State shall not be filed with a local filing officer.(f) Once a person or entity is required to file online or electronically, the person or entity shall be required to file all subsequent reports online or electronically.SEC. 54. Section 84612 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 27 of Chapter 662 of the Statutes of 2018, is amended to read:84612. If the Secretary of State rejects a filing made under this chapter, the Secretary of State shall immediately notify the filer of the reason or reasons for rejection using plain, straightforward language, avoiding technical terms as much as possible, and using a coherent and easily readable style. The notice shall be written or displayed so that the meaning will be easily understood by those persons directly affected by it. The Cal-Access Replacement System may contain required fields in which information must be entered in order to submit a report or statement, as determined by the Secretary of State and the Commission.SEC. 55. Section 84615 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 4 of Chapter 180 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:84615. A local government agency may require an elected officer, candidate, committee, or other person required to file reports or other documents required by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 84100), except an elected officer, candidate, committee, or other person who receives contributions totaling less than two thousand dollars ($2,000), and makes expenditures totaling less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) in a calendar year, to file those reports or other documents online or electronically with a local filing officer. A local government agency that requires online or electronic filing pursuant to this section shall comply with all of the following:(a) The legislative body for the local government agency shall adopt an ordinance approving the use of online or electronic filing, which shall include a legislative finding that the online or electronic filing system will operate securely and effectively and would not unduly burden filers. The ordinance adopted by the legislative body for the local government agency may, at the discretion of that legislative body, specify that the electronic or online filing requirements apply only to specifically identified types of filings or are triggered only by identified monetary thresholds. In any instance in which the original report or other document is required to be filed with the Secretary of State and a copy of that report or other document is required to be filed with the local government agency, the ordinance may permit, but shall not require, that the copy be filed online or electronically.(b) The online or electronic filing system shall accept a filing in the standardized record format that was developed by the Secretary of State pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 84602, or the local government agency may transition to the Cal-Access Replacement System format, and then the system shall accept a filing in the new standardized record format developed by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 84602, and that is compatible with the Secretary of State’s system for receiving an online or electronic filing.(c) The online or electronic filing system shall ensure the integrity of the data transmitted and shall include safeguards against efforts to tamper with, manipulate, alter, or subvert the data.(d) (1) The local filing officer shall issue to a person who files a report or other document online or electronically an electronic confirmation that notifies the filer that the report or other document was received. The confirmation shall include the date and the time that the report or other document was received by the filing officer and the method by which the filer may view and print the data received by the filing officer.(2) A copy retained by the filer of a report or other document that was filed online or electronically and the confirmation issued pursuant to paragraph (1) that shows the filer timely filed the report or other document shall create a rebuttable presumption that the filer timely filed the report or other document.(e) The date of filing for a report or other document that is filed online or electronically shall be the day that it is received by the local filing officer.(f) The local filing officer shall make all the data filed available online in an easily understood format that provides the greatest public access. The data shall be made available free of charge and as soon as possible after receipt. The data made available online shall not contain the street name and building number of the persons or entity representatives listed on the electronically filed forms or any bank account number required to be disclosed by the filer. Except as provided in Section 84101, the local filing officer shall make a complete, unredacted copy of any report or other document filed pursuant to this section, including any street names and building numbers disclosed by the filer, available to any person upon request.(g) The online or electronic filing system shall include a procedure for filers to comply with the requirement that they sign reports under penalty of perjury pursuant to Section 81004.(h) The local government agency shall enable filers to complete and submit filings free of charge.(i) The local filing officer shall maintain, for a period of at least 10 years commencing from the date filed, a secured, official version of each online or electronic report or other document filed pursuant to this section, which shall serve as the official version of that record for purpose of audits and any other legal purpose. Data that has been maintained for at least 10 years may then be archived in a secure format.(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any report or other document filed online or electronically pursuant to this section shall not be required to be filed with the local filing officer in paper format.SEC. 56. Section 84616 of the Government Code is amended to read:84616. (a) Within 72 hours of each applicable filing deadline, a local government agency shall post on its internet website a copy of any report or other document required by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 84100) that is filed with that agency in paper format, or by email or fax. If the report or document is filed late by the filer, the local government agency shall post the copy within 72 hours of receipt of the report or document. If the final day of the 72-hour period is a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, the period is extended to the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday. Before posting, the local filing officer shall redact the street name and building number of the persons or entity representatives listed on any report or document, or any bank account number required to be disclosed by the filer. Providing a link on the agency’s internet website to the report or other document satisfies this subdivision.(b) A report or other document posted pursuant to this section shall be made available for four years from the date of the election associated with the filing.(c) If a local government agency receives a filing that was required to be filed with a different agency or person, and the filing was not required to be filed with the receiving agency, the local government agency is not required to post the filing pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall notify the filer of the error.SEC. 57. Section 85200 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 29 of Chapter 662 of the Statutes of 2018, is amended to read:85200. (a) Before becoming a candidate for a specific office, an individual shall file a statement of intention to be a candidate, signed under penalty of perjury.(1) An individual who intends to be a candidate for elective state office shall file the statement of intention online or electronically with the Secretary of State.(2) An individual who intends to be a candidate for any other elective office shall file the statement of intention with the same filing officer and in the same location as the individual would file an original campaign report pursuant to subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 84215.(b) Candidates and officeholders who do not intend to qualify as a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 shall indicate this status on the statement of intention.(1) Each candidate or officeholder who has indicated their intention to not qualify as a committee pursuant to this subdivision, but thereafter qualifies as a committee by receiving contributions or making expenditures totaling two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more in a calendar year, shall amend their statement of intention with the Secretary of State or their local filing officer within 48 hours of qualifying and register as a committee pursuant to Section 84101.(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, in calculating whether two thousand dollars ($2,000) in expenditures have been made, payments for a filing fee or for a statement of qualification shall not be included if the payments are made from the candidate’s personal funds.(c) For purposes of this section, “contribution” does not include any payments from the candidate’s personal funds for a candidate filing fee or a candidate statement of qualifications fee.SEC. 58. Section 85201 of the Government Code is amended to read:85201. (a) Before the solicitation or receipt of any contribution or loan, a candidate who has filed a statement of intention pursuant to Section 85200 shall establish one campaign contribution account at an office of a financial institution located in the state.(b) As required by subdivision (f) of Section 84102, a candidate who raises contributions of two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more in a calendar year shall set forth the name and address of the financial institution where the candidate has established a campaign contribution account and the account number on the committee registration filed pursuant to Sections 84101 and 84103.(c) All contributions or loans made to the candidate, to a person on behalf of the candidate, or to the candidate’s controlled committee shall be deposited in the account.(d) Any personal funds which will be utilized to promote the election of the candidate shall be deposited in the account prior to expenditure.(e) All campaign expenditures shall be made from the account.(f) Subdivisions (d) and (e) do not apply to a candidate’s payment for a filing fee and statement of qualifications from the candidate’s personal funds.(g) This section does not apply to a candidate who will not receive contributions and who makes expenditures from personal funds of less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) in a calendar year to support the candidate’s candidacy. For purposes of this section, a candidate’s payment for a filing fee and statement of qualifications shall not be included in calculating the total expenditures made.(h) An individual who raises contributions from others for that individual’s campaign, but who raises or spends less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) in a calendar year, and does not qualify as a committee under Section 82013, shall establish a campaign contribution account pursuant to subdivision (a), but is not required to file a committee registration pursuant to Section 84101 or other statement of bank account information.SEC. 59. Section 85307 of the Government Code is amended to read:85307. (a) The provisions of this article regarding loans apply to extensions of credit, but do not apply to loans made to a candidate by a commercial lending institution in the lender’s regular course of business on terms available to members of the general public for which the candidate is personally liable.(b) A candidate shall not charge interest on any loan the candidate made to the candidate’s campaign. This subdivision does not apply to a jurisdiction in which the county or city imposes a limit on contributions pursuant to Section 85702.5.SEC. 60. Section 85400 of the Government Code is amended to read:85400. (a) A candidate for elective state office, other than the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, who voluntarily accepts expenditure limits shall not make campaign expenditures in excess of the following:(1) For an Assembly candidate, four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) in the primary or special primary election and seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) in the general or special general election.(2) For a Senate candidate, six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) in the primary or special primary election and nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) in the general or special general election.(3) For a candidate for the State Board of Equalization, one million dollars ($1,000,000) in the primary election and one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in the general election.(4) For a statewide candidate other than a candidate for Governor or the State Board of Equalization, four million dollars ($4,000,000) in the primary election and six million dollars ($6,000,000) in the general election.(5) For a candidate for Governor, six million dollars ($6,000,000) in the primary election and ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in the general election.(b) For purposes of this section, “campaign expenditures” has the same meaning as “election-related activities” as defined in Section 82022.5, except that it does not include preparing campaign finance disclosure reports.(c) A campaign expenditure made by a political party on behalf of a candidate shall not be attributed to the limitations on campaign expenditures set forth in this section.SEC. 61. Section 85505 of the Government Code is amended to read:85505. (a) The Secretary of State shall include on its internet website, as part of the campaign finance activity that is publicly disclosed, any independent expenditure, as defined in Section 82031, that is reported pursuant to Section 85500 with respect to a candidate for elective state office and a statewide ballot measure. This information shall be linked to the part of the website that the Secretary of State maintains concerning that candidate or ballot measure.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that a report required pursuant to Section 85500 include a separate field for the filer to input the legislative district number and the number or letter of a statewide ballot measure.SEC. 62. Section 85704 of the Government Code is amended to read:85704. (a) A person shall not make any contribution to a committee or candidate that is earmarked for a contribution to any other particular committee, ballot measure, or candidate unless the contribution is fully disclosed pursuant to Section 84302.(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), a contribution is earmarked if the contribution is made under any of the following circumstances:(1) The committee or candidate receiving the contribution solicited the contribution for the purpose of making a contribution to another specifically identified committee, ballot measure, or candidate, requested the contributor to expressly consent to such use, and the contributor consents to such use.(2) The contribution was made subject to a condition or agreement with the contributor that all or a portion of the contribution would be used to make a contribution to another specifically identified committee, ballot measure, or candidate.(3) After the contribution was made, the contributor and the committee or candidate receiving the contribution reached a subsequent agreement that all or a portion of the contribution would be used to make a contribution to another specifically identified committee, ballot measure, or candidate.(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), dues, assessments, fees, and similar payments made to a membership organization or its sponsored committee in an amount less than five hundred dollars ($500) per calendar year from a single source for the purpose of making contributions or expenditures shall not be considered earmarked.(d) The committee making the earmarked contribution shall provide the committee receiving the earmarked contribution with the name, address, occupation, and employer, if any, or principal place of business, if self-employed, of the contributor or contributors who earmarked their funds and the amount of the earmarked contribution from each contributor at the time it makes the contribution. If the committee making the contribution received earmarked contributions that exceed the amount contributed, or received contributions that were not earmarked, the committee making the contribution shall use a reasonable accounting method to determine which contributors to identify pursuant to this subdivision, but in no case shall the same contribution be disclosed more than one time to avoid disclosure of additional contributors who earmarked their funds.(e) Earmarked contributions shall be disclosed on reports required by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 84100) as follows:(1) A contributor who qualifies as a committee pursuant to Section 82013 and who makes a contribution to a committee but earmarks the funds to another specifically identified committee pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) shall disclose the specifically identified committee as the recipient of the contribution and the other committee as an intermediary at the time the earmarked contribution is made. The specifically identified committee shall disclose the contributor and intermediary at the time the funds are received from the intermediary. The intermediary committee shall disclose receipt of the funds as a miscellaneous increase to cash at the time the funds are received and shall disclose the expenditure as the transfer of an earmarked contribution from the contributor to the specifically identified committee at the time the funds are transferred to the specifically identified committee.(2) A contributor who qualifies as a committee pursuant to Section 82013 and who makes a contribution to a committee and subsequently earmarks the funds pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall include a notation on the contributor’s next report required pursuant to Sections 84200, 84200.5, 84202.3, and 84202.7 that the original contribution was subsequently earmarked, including the name of the specifically identified committee, ballot measure, or candidate supported or opposed. The committee that previously received the funds shall also include a notation on its next report required pursuant to Sections 84200, 84200.5, 84202.3, and 84202.7 that the original contribution was subsequently earmarked and shall disclose the original contributor to any new committee to which it transfers the earmarked funds. The new committee shall disclose the true source of the contribution with a notation that the contribution was earmarked to the specific ballot measure or candidate.(3) A contributor who qualifies as a committee pursuant to Section 82013 and who earmarks a contribution to a specifically identified ballot measure or candidate shall disclose a contribution to the committee that received the contribution with a notation that the contribution was earmarked to the specific ballot measure or candidate. Compliance with this paragraph satisfies the contributor’s disclosure obligations under this title. The committee receiving the earmarked contribution shall disclose the contributor with a notation that the contribution was earmarked to the specific ballot measure or candidate when the contribution is received. The committee receiving the funds is solely responsible for disclosing the ultimate use of the earmarked contribution, whether by contribution or expenditure, at the time the funds are used. If the committee receiving the earmarked contribution contributes any portion of the contribution to another committee to support or oppose the specifically identified ballot measure or candidate, that committee shall disclose the true source of the contribution to the new committee receiving the earmarked funds for disclosure on the new committee’s campaign report. The new committee shall disclose the true source of the contribution with a notation that the contribution was earmarked to the specific ballot measure or candidate.(f) A violation of this section shall not be based solely on the timing of contributions made or received.SEC. 63. Section 86116 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 873 of the Statutes of 2022, is amended to read:86116. Every person described in Section 86115 shall file periodic reports containing the following information:(a) The name, business address, email address, and telephone number of the lobbyist employer or other person filing the report.(b) The total amount of payments to each lobbying firm.(c) The total amount of all payments to lobbyists employed by the filer.(d) The information required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 86114. A person described in Section 86115 may, in a manner authorized by the commission, refer to and incorporate by reference the information contained in a report filed by the person’s lobbying firm pursuant to Section 86114 to meet the requirement of this subdivision.(e) A periodic report completed and verified by each lobbyist employed by a lobbyist employer pursuant to Section 86113.(f) Each activity expense of the filer. A total of all activity expenses of the filer shall be included.(g) The date, amount, and the name of the recipient of any contribution of one hundred dollars ($100) or more made by the filer to an elected state officer, a state candidate, or a committee controlled by an elected state officer or state candidate, or a committee primarily formed to support or oppose the officer or candidate. If this contribution is reported by the filer or by a committee sponsored by the filer in a campaign report filed pursuant to Chapter 4 which is required to be filed with the Secretary of State, the filer may report only the name of the committee, and the identification number of the committee.(h) (1) Except as set forth in paragraph (2), the total of all other payments to influence legislative or administrative action including overhead expenses and all payments to employees who spend more than 10 percent of their compensated time in any one month in activities related to influencing legislative or administrative action. Any payment to influence legislative or administrative action totaling two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or more to a payee during a reporting period that was made in connection with an issue lobbying advertisement must include the identification number or, if none exists, the official title, popular name, or description of any legislative or administrative action clearly referred to in the issue lobbying advertisement as well as one of the following descriptions of the position of the filer who paid for the advertisement: “support,” “oppose,” “support if amended,” “oppose unless amended,” “neutral,” “neutral seeking amendment,” “neutral expressing concerns,” “no position,” or similar description.(2) A filer that makes payments to influence a ratemaking or quasi-legislative proceeding before the Public Utilities Commission, as defined in subdivision (b) or (c), respectively, of Section 82002, may, in lieu of reporting those payments pursuant to paragraph (1), report only the portion of those payments made to or for the filer’s attorneys for time spent appearing as counsel and preparing to appear as counsel, or to or for the filer’s witnesses for time spent testifying and preparing to testify, in this type of Public Utilities Commission proceeding. This alternative reporting of these payments made during a calendar month is not required to include payments made to an attorney or witness who is an employee of the filer if 10 percent or less of the attorney’s or witness’s compensated time in that month was spent appearing, testifying, or preparing to appear or testify before the Public Utilities Commission in a ratemaking or quasi-legislative proceeding. For the purposes of this paragraph, time spent preparing to appear or preparing to testify does not include time spent preparing written testimony.(i) Any other information required by the commission consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter.SEC. 64. Section 89502 of the Government Code is amended to read:89502. (a) An elected state officer, elected officer of a local government agency, or other individual specified in Section 87200 shall not accept any honorarium.(b) (1) A candidate for elective state office, for judicial office, or for elective office in a local government agency shall not accept any honorarium. A person shall be deemed a candidate for purposes of this subdivision when the person has filed a committee registration for election to a state or local office, a declaration of intent, or a declaration of candidacy, whichever occurs first. A person shall not be deemed a candidate for purposes of this subdivision after the person is sworn into the elective office, or, if the person lost the election, after the person has terminated the person’s campaign filing obligations for that office pursuant to Section 84214 or after certification of the election results, whichever is earlier.(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to any person who is a candidate as described in paragraph (1) for judicial office on or before December 31, 1996.(c) A member of a state board or commission or designated employee of a state or local government agency shall not accept an honorarium from any source if the member or employee would be required to report the receipt of income or gifts from that source on the member’s or employee’s statement of economic interests.(d) This section does not apply to a person in the person’s capacity as judge. This section does not apply to a person in the person’s capacity as a part-time member of the governing board of any public institution of higher education unless that position is an elective office.SEC. 65. Section 89503 of the Government Code is amended to read:89503. (a) An elected state officer, elected officer of a local government agency, or other individual specified in Section 87200 shall not accept gifts from any single source in any calendar year with a total value of more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(b) (1) A candidate for elective state office, for judicial office, or for elective office in a local government agency shall not accept gifts from any single source in any calendar year with a total value of more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). A person shall be deemed a candidate for purposes of this subdivision when the person has filed a committee registration for election to a state or local office, a declaration of intent, or a declaration of candidacy, whichever occurs first. A person shall not be deemed a candidate for purposes of this subdivision after the person is sworn into the elective office, or, if the person lost the election, after the person has terminated the person’s campaign filing obligations for that office pursuant to Section 84214 or after certification of the election results, whichever is earlier.(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to any person who is a candidate as described in paragraph (1) for judicial office on or before December 31, 1996.(c) A member of a state board or commission or designated employee of a state or local government agency shall not accept gifts from any single source in any calendar year with a total value of more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if the member or employee would be required to report the receipt of income or gifts from that source on the member’s statement of economic interests.(d) This section does not apply to a person in the person’s capacity as judge. This section does not apply to a person in the person’s capacity as a part-time member of the governing board of any public institution of higher education unless that position is an elective office.(e) This section does not prohibit or limit the following:(1) Payments, advances, or reimbursements for travel and related lodging and subsistence permitted by Section 89506.(2) Wedding gifts and gifts exchanged between individuals on birthdays, holidays, and other similar occasions, provided that the gifts exchanged are not substantially disproportionate in value.(f) Beginning on January 1, 1993, the commission shall adjust the gift limitation in this section on January 1 of each odd-numbered year to reflect changes in the Consumer Price Index, rounded to the nearest ten dollars ($10).(g) The limitations in this section are in addition to the limitations on gifts in Section 86203.SEC. 66. Section 89511.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:89511.5. (a) An incumbent elected officer may utilize the incumbent elected officer’s personal funds for expenditures authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 89510 without first depositing those funds in the incumbent elected officer’s controlled committee’s campaign bank account, if both of the following conditions are met:(1) The expenditures are not campaign expenses.(2) The treasurer of the committee is provided with a dated receipt and a written description of the expenditure.(b) An incumbent elected officer may be reimbursed for expenditures of the incumbent elected officer’s personal funds, from either the controlled committee campaign bank account established pursuant to Section 85201 with respect to election to the incumbent term of office, or from a controlled committee campaign bank account established pursuant to Section 85201 with respect to election to a future term of office, if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The expenditures are not campaign expenses.(2) The incumbent elected officer, prior to reimbursement, provides the treasurer of the committee with a dated receipt and a written description of each expenditure.(3) Reimbursement is paid within 90 days of the expenditure, in the case of a cash expenditure, or within 90 days of the end of the billing period in which it was included, in the case of an expenditure charged to a credit card or charge account.(c) When the elected officer’s controlled committee is notified that expenditures totaling one hundred dollars ($100) or more in a fiscal year have been made by the incumbent elected officer, the committee shall report, pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 84211, the expenditures on the campaign report for the period in which the expenditures were made and the reimbursements on the campaign report for the period in which the reimbursements were made.(d) If reimbursement is not paid within the time authorized by this section, the expenditure shall be reported on the campaign report as a nonmonetary contribution received on the 90th day after the expenditure is paid, in the case of a cash expenditure, or within 90 days of the end of the billing period in which it was included, in the case of an expenditure charged to a credit card or charge account.(e) This section shall not be construed to authorize an incumbent elected officer to make expenditures from any campaign bank account for expenses other than those expenses associated with the incumbent elected officer’s election to the specific office for which the account was established and expenses associated with holding that office.SEC. 67. Section 89517.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:89517.5. (a) (1) For purposes of this section, “security expenses” include all of the following:(A) The reasonable costs of installing and monitoring a home or office electronic security for a candidate, elected officer, or the immediate family or staff of a candidate or elected officer.(B) The reasonable costs of providing personal security to a candidate, elected officer, or the immediate family or staff of a candidate or elected officer.(C) Any other tangible item related to security for a candidate, elected officer, or the immediate family or staff of a candidate or elected officer.(2) “Security expenses” do not include either of the following:(A) Payments to a relative, within the third degree of consanguinity, of a candidate or elected officer.(B) Payments for a firearm.(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 89517, campaign funds may be used to pay, or reimburse the state, for security expenses to protect a candidate, an elected officer, or the immediate family or staff of a candidate or elected officer, provided that the threat or potential threat to safety arises from the candidate’s or elected officer’s activities, duties, or status as a candidate or elected officer or from staff’s position as staff of the candidate or elected officer.(2) Expenditures of campaign funds pursuant to this section shall be limited to a lifetime maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a person who is a candidate or elected officer. This lifetime maximum shall apply regardless of whether the person is a candidate or an elected officer for multiple offices.(c) (1) If a committee uses campaign funds to pay, or reimburse the state, for the costs of installing a home or office electronic security system or for any other tangible item related to security, either the security system or other item shall be returned to the committee or reimbursement for the security system or other item shall be made to the campaign fund account of the committee that paid for the security system or other item, pursuant to the requirements of paragraphs (2) and (3).(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), return or reimbursement is due within one year of when the elected officer leaves the office for which the security system or other tangible item related to security was purchased or when the candidate is no longer a candidate for the office for which the security system or other item was purchased, or, if applicable, upon sale of the property on which the security system is installed, whichever occurs sooner.(B) If there is a continuing threat to the physical safety of the candidate or elected officer, the threat arises from the candidate’s or elected officer’s activities, duties, or status as a candidate or elected officer, and the threat has been reported to and verified by an appropriate law enforcement agency, return or reimbursement is due within one year of when the threat verified by the law enforcement agency ceases, or, if applicable, upon sale of the property on which the security system is installed, whichever occurs sooner.(3) The amount of the reimbursement shall be the fair market value of the security system or other tangible item related to security at the time that reimbursement is paid or due pursuant to paragraph (2), whichever occurs sooner. For a security system installed at the home or office of, or for an item purchased for, a candidate or elected officer, the candidate or elected officer shall pay the reimbursement. For a security system installed at the home or office of, or for an item purchased for, immediate family or staff, either the candidate or elected officer, or the immediate family or staff, shall pay the reimbursement.(d) The immediate family or staff of the candidate or elected officer shall not be personally liable for reimbursement for expenditures for security expenses pursuant to this section.(e) (1) The candidate or elected officer shall report an expenditure pursuant to subdivision (b) and a reimbursement pursuant to subdivision (c) on the candidate’s or elected officer’s campaign report filed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 84200) of Chapter 4.(2) With each report described in paragraph (1), the candidate or elected officer shall also submit a form to the Commission, in a manner prescribed by the Commission and signed under penalty of perjury, that describes and verifies the threat or potential threat to the candidate or elected officer, or to their immediate family or staff, that arose from the candidate’s or elected officer’s activities, duties, or status as a candidate or elected officer and that necessitated the expenditure or reimbursement.(3) As part of the recordkeeping requirements in Section 84104, the candidate or elected officer shall maintain detailed accounts, records, bills, and receipts relating to an expenditure or reimbursement described in paragraph (1), including records providing evidence of the threat or potential threat to safety that gave rise to the need for the expenditure.SEC. 67.5. Section 89517.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:89517.5. (a) (1) For purposes of this section, “security expenses” include all of the following:(A) The reasonable costs of installing and monitoring a home or office electronic security for a candidate, elected officer, or the immediate family or staff of a candidate or elected officer.(B) The reasonable costs of providing personal security to a candidate, elected officer, or the immediate family or staff of a candidate or elected officer.(C) Any other tangible item related to security for a candidate, elected officer, or the immediate family or staff of a candidate or elected officer.(2) “Security expenses” do not include either of the following:(A) Payments to the candidate’s or elected officer’s spouse, child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, parent-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, nephew, niece, aunt, uncle, or first cousin or the spouse of any such person.(B) Payments for a firearm.(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 89517, campaign funds may be used to pay, or reimburse the state, for security expenses to protect a candidate, an elected officer, or the immediate family or staff of a candidate or elected officer, provided that the threat or potential threat to safety arises from the candidate’s or elected officer’s activities, duties, or status as a candidate or elected officer or from staff’s position as staff of the candidate or elected officer.(2) (A) A candidate or elected officer may expend campaign funds pursuant to this section without any monetary cap until January 1, 2029.(B) Beginning January 1, 2029, a candidate or elected officer may expend up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of campaign funds pursuant to this section per calendar year. This limit applies regardless of the number of offices the candidate or elected officer seeks or holds.(c) (1) If a committee uses campaign funds to pay, or reimburse the state, for the costs of installing a home or office electronic security system or for any other tangible item related to security, either the security system or other item shall be returned to the committee or reimbursement for the security system or other item shall be made to the campaign fund account of the committee that paid for the security system or other item, pursuant to the requirements of paragraphs (2) and (3).(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), return or reimbursement is due within one year of when the elected officer leaves the office for which the security system or other tangible item related to security was purchased or when the candidate is no longer a candidate for the office for which the security system or other item was purchased, or, if applicable, upon sale of the property on which the security system is installed, whichever occurs sooner.(B) If there is a continuing threat to the physical safety of the candidate or elected officer, the threat arises from the candidate’s or elected officer’s activities, duties, or status as a candidate or elected officer, and the threat has been reported to and verified by an appropriate law enforcement agency, return or reimbursement is due within one year of when the threat verified by the law enforcement agency ceases, or, if applicable, upon sale of the property on which the security system is installed, whichever occurs sooner.(3) The amount of the reimbursement shall be the fair market value of the security system or other tangible item related to security at the time that reimbursement is paid or due pursuant to paragraph (2), whichever occurs sooner. For a security system installed at the home or office of, or for an item purchased for, a candidate or elected officer, the candidate or elected officer shall pay the reimbursement. For a security system installed at the home or office of, or for an item purchased for, immediate family or staff, either the candidate or elected officer, or the immediate family or staff, shall pay the reimbursement.(d) The immediate family or staff of the candidate or elected officer shall not be personally liable for reimbursement for expenditures for security expenses pursuant to this section.(e) (1) The candidate or elected officer shall report an expenditure pursuant to subdivision (b) and a reimbursement pursuant to subdivision (c) on the candidate’s or elected officer’s campaign report filed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 84200) of Chapter 4.(2) With each report described in paragraph (1), the candidate or elected officer shall also submit a form to the Commission, in a manner prescribed by the Commission and signed under penalty of perjury, that describes and verifies the threat or potential threat to the candidate or elected officer, or to their immediate family or staff, that arose from the candidate’s or elected officer’s activities, duties, or status as a candidate or elected officer and that necessitated the expenditure or reimbursement.(3) As part of the recordkeeping requirements in Section 84104, the candidate or elected officer shall maintain detailed accounts, records, bills, and receipts relating to an expenditure or reimbursement described in paragraph (1), including records providing evidence of the threat or potential threat to safety that gave rise to the need for the expenditure.SEC. 68. Section 89517.6 of the Government Code is amended to read:89517.6. Notwithstanding Section 89517, campaign funds may be used to pay for, or reimburse the state for, the costs of installing and monitoring hardware, software, or services related to the cybersecurity of electronic devices of a candidate, elected officer, or campaign worker. The candidate or elected officer shall report any expenditure of campaign funds made pursuant to this section to the commission in the candidate’s or elected officer’s campaign reports filed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 84200) of Chapter 4 of this title.SEC. 69. Section 90001 of the Government Code is amended to read:90001. Audits and investigations shall be made pursuant to Section 90000 with respect to the reports and statements of:(a) Each lobbying firm and each lobbyist employer who employs one or more lobbyists shall be subject to an audit on a random basis with these lobbying firms or lobbyist employers having a 25-percent chance of being audited. When a lobbying firm or lobbyist employer is audited, the individual lobbyists who are employed by the lobbying firm or the lobbyist employer shall also be audited.(b) Each statewide, Supreme Court, court of appeal, or Board of Equalization candidate in a direct primary or general election for whom it is determined that twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more in contributions have been raised or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more in expenditures have been made, whether by the candidate or by a committee or committees controlled by the candidate or whose participation in the direct primary or general election is primarily in support of the candidate’s candidacy. Each statewide candidate whose contributions and expenditures are less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be subject to an audit on a random basis of 10 percent of the number of such candidates.(c) Each candidate for the Legislature or superior court judge in a direct primary or general election shall be subject to audit by random selection if it is determined that fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more in contributions have been received or fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more in expenditures have been made, whether by the candidate or by a committee or committees controlled by the candidate or primarily supporting the candidate’s candidacy. Random selection shall be made of 25 percent of the Senate districts, 25 percent of the Assembly districts, and 25 percent of the judicial offices contested in an election year.(d) Each candidate for the Legislature in a special primary or special runoff election for whom it is determined that fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more in contributions have been raised or fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more in expenditures have been made, whether by the candidate or by a committee or committees controlled by the candidate or primarily supporting the candidate’s candidacy.(e) Each controlled committee of any candidate who is being audited pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d).(f) Each committee, other than a committee specified in subdivision (c) of Section 82013, primarily supporting or opposing a candidate who is being audited pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) if it is determined that the committee has expended more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).(g) Each committee, other than a committee specified in subdivision (c) of Section 82013, whose participation is primarily in support of or in opposition to a state measure or state measures if it is determined that the committee has expended more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) on such measure or measures.(h) Each committee, other than a committee defined in subdivision (c) of Section 82013, a controlled committee or a committee primarily supporting or opposing a state candidate or measure, if it is determined that the committee has raised or expended more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) supporting or opposing state candidates or state measures during any calendar year, except that if the commission determines from an audit report that a committee is in substantial compliance with the provisions of the act, the committee thereafter shall be subject to an audit on a random basis with each such committee having a 25-percent chance of being audited.(i) (1) With respect to local candidates and their controlled committees, the commission shall promulgate regulations which provide a method of selection for these audits.(2) With respect to candidates for the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, the commission shall promulgate regulations that provide a method for selection of these audits. The Public Employees’ Retirement System shall reimburse the commission for all reasonable expenses incurred pursuant to this section.(j) In accordance with subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (h), the Fair Political Practices Commission shall select by lot the persons or districts to be audited on a random basis. For campaign audits the selection shall be made in public after the last date for filing the first report following the general or special election for which the candidate ran, or following the election at which the measure was adopted or defeated. For lobbying firm and lobbyist employer audits, the selection shall be made in public in February of odd-numbered years.SEC. 70. Section 90002 of the Government Code is amended to read:90002. (a) The scope of audits and investigations under Section 90001 is as follows:(1) Audits and investigations of lobbying firms and employers of lobbyists shall be conducted biennially covering reports filed during the previous two-year period. If a lobbying firm or lobbyist employer keeps a separate account for all receipts and payments for which reporting is required by this chapter, the requirement of an audit under subdivision (a) of Section 90001 shall be satisfied by an audit of that account and the supporting documentation required to be maintained by Section 86110.(2) For campaign reports of a candidate, controlled committee, or committee primarily supporting or opposing a candidate, the audit or investigation shall cover all campaign reports filed for the primary and general election, or a special or runoff election, as well as any previous campaign reports filed since the last election for that office. The audit or investigation shall not include reports previously audited under Section 90001 or 90003.(3) For campaign reports of a committee primarily supporting or opposing a measure, the audit or investigation shall cover all campaign reports filed by the committee in connection with the measure.(4) For all other committees, the audit or investigation shall cover all campaign reports filed during the previous two calendar years.(b) The audit or investigation periods may be extended to include any transaction that relates to or is connected with the election being audited or investigated or the two-year period.(c) An audit or investigation conducted under Section 90001 shall not include campaign reports filed in conjunction with an election for any other office.(d) This section shall not be interpreted to act as a limit on the Franchise Tax Board or the Commission in undertaking a discretionary audit under Section 90003.SEC. 71. Section 90004 of the Government Code is amended to read:90004. (a) The Franchise Tax Board shall periodically prepare reports, which, except as otherwise provided in this section, shall be sent to the Commission, the Secretary of State, and the Attorney General. If the reports relate to candidates for or committees supporting or opposing candidates for the office of Attorney General, the reports shall be sent to the Commission, the Secretary of State, and the District Attorneys of the Counties of Los Angeles, Sacramento, and San Francisco. If the reports relate to local candidates and their controlled committees, the reports shall be sent to the Commission, the local filing officer with whom the candidate or committee is required to file the originals of campaign reports pursuant to Section 84215, and the district attorney for the candidate’s county of domicile.(b) The Franchise Tax Board shall complete its report of any audit conducted on a random basis pursuant to Section 90001 within two years after the person or entity subject to the audit is selected by the Commission to be audited.(c) The reports of the Franchise Tax Board shall be public documents and shall contain in detail the Franchise Tax Board’s findings with respect to the accuracy and completeness of each report and statement reviewed and its findings with respect to any report or statement that should have been but was not filed. The Secretary of State and the local filing officer shall place the audit reports in the appropriate campaign report or lobbying files.SEC. 72. Section 91010 of the Government Code is amended to read:91010. No request to the civil prosecutor pursuant to Section 91007 shall be made or filed in connection with a report required by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 84100) until the time when an audit and investigation could be begun under subdivision (c) of Section 90002.SEC. 73. Section 91011 of the Government Code is amended to read:91011. (a) A civil action alleging a violation in connection with a report required by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 84100) shall not be filed more than four years after an audit could begin as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 90002, as that section existed on January 1, 2014, or more than one year after the Franchise Tax Board forwards its report to the commission, pursuant to Section 90004, of any audit conducted of the alleged violator, whichever period is less.(b) A civil action alleging a violation of any provisions of this title, other than those described in subdivision (a), shall not be filed more than four years after the date the violation occurred.SEC. 74. Section 91013 of the Government Code is amended to read:91013. (a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) to (4), if any person files an original statement or report after any deadline imposed by this act, the person shall, in addition to any other penalties or remedies established by this act, be liable in the amount of ten dollars ($10) per day after the deadline until the statement or report is filed, to the officer with whom the statement or report is required to be filed.(2) Liability need not be enforced by the filing officer if on an impartial basis the filing officer determines that the late filing was not willful and that enforcement of the liability will not further the purposes of the act, except that liability shall not be waived pursuant to this paragraph if a statement or report is not filed within 30 days for a statement of economic interest, other than a candidate’s statement filed pursuant to Section 87201, 5 days for a campaign report required to be filed 12 days before an election, and 10 days for all other statements or reports, after the filing officer has sent specific written notice of the filing requirement.(3) Liability shall not be enforced by the filing officer if the person who filed the late statement or report was unable to timely file the statement or report due to serious illness or hospitalization.(4) Liability shall not be enforced by the filing officer if the person who filed the late statement or report completes the political reform education program pursuant to Section 83116.7 for that late filing violation.(b) If any person files a copy of a statement or report after any deadline imposed by this act, the person shall, in addition to any other penalties or remedies established by this chapter, be liable in the amount of ten dollars ($10) per day, starting 10 days, or 5 days in the case of a campaign report required to be filed 12 days before an election, after the officer has sent specific written notice of the filing requirement and until the statement is filed. Liability shall not be enforced by the filing officer in either of the following circumstances:(1) The person who filed the late copy of the statement or report was unable to timely file the copy of the statement or report due to serious illness or hospitalization.(2) The person who filed the late copy of the statement or report completes the political reform education program pursuant to Section 83116.7 for that late filing violation.(c) The officer shall deposit any funds received under this section into the general fund of the jurisdiction of which the filing officer is an officer. Liability under this section shall not exceed the cumulative amount stated in the late statement or report, or one hundred dollars ($100), whichever is greater.SEC. 75. Section 42.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 84224 of the Government Code proposed by this bill and SB 760. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 84224 of the Government Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after SB 760, in which case Section 84224 of the Government Code, as amended by SB 760, shall remain operative only until the operative date of this bill, at which time Section 42.5 of this bill shall become operative, and Section 42 of this bill shall not become operative.SEC. 76. Section 67.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 89517.5 of the Government Code proposed by this bill and AB 789. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 89517.5 of the Government Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after AB 789, in which case Section 89517.5 of the Government Code, as amended by AB 789, shall remain operative only until the operative date of this bill, at which time Section 67.5 of this bill shall become operative, and Section 67 of this bill shall not become operative.SEC. 77. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 78. This act shall not become operative until the Secretary of State certifies an online filing and disclosure system pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 84602 of the Government Code.SEC. 79. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.